Maryland, session 2025, SB0423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
14–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(A–1) “ADVISORY COMMITTEE” MEANS A COMMITTEE APPOINTED BY THE
BOARD THAT INCLUDES MEMBERS OF A PROFESSION REGULATED UNDER THIS
TITLE OR TITLE 15 OF THIS ARTICLE AND FORMED TO:
(1) FURTHER THE BOARD’S REGULATION OF APPLICANTS AND
LICENSEES OF THE REGULATED PROFESSION;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(2) ASSIST THE BOARD IN PROTECTING THE HEALTH, SAFETY, AND
WELFARE OF THE PUBLIC; AND
(3) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS ABOUT THE REGULATED PROFESSION
TO THE BOARD ON REQUEST.
[(a–1)] (A–2) “Allied health professional” means an individual licensed by the
Board under Subtitle 5A, 5B, 5C, 5D, 5E, [or] 5F, OR 5G of this title or Title 15 of this
article.
(A–3) “ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–401
OF THIS ARTICLE.
(A–4) “APPLICANT” MEANS, UNLESS THE CONTEXT REQUIRES OTHERWISE, AN
INDIVIDUAL APPLYING FOR INITIAL LICENSURE, RENEWAL, OR REINSTATEMENT AS
A PHYSICIAN OR AN ALLIED HEALTH PROFESSIONAL IN THE STATE.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Physicians.
(c) “Board certified” means the physician is certified by a public or private board,
including a multidisciplinary board, and the certifying board:
(1) Is:
(i) A member of the American Board of Medical Specialties;
(ii) An American Osteopathic Association certifying board;
(iii) The Royal College of Physicians and Surgeons of Canada; or
(iv) The College of Family Physicians of Canada; OR
(2) [Has been approved by the Board under § 14–101.1 of this subtitle; or
(3)] Requires that, in order to be certified, the physician:
(i) Complete a postgraduate training program that:
1. Provides complete training in the specialty or
subspecialty; and
2. Is accredited by the Accreditation Council for Graduate
Medical Education or the American Osteopathic Association; and
– 3 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) Be certified by:
1. The member board of the American Board of Medical
Specialties;
2. The American Osteopathic Association in the training
field;
3. The Royal College of Physicians and Surgeons of Canada;
or
4. The College of Family Physicians of Canada.
(d) “Civil action” includes a health care malpractice claim under Title 3, Subtitle
2A of the Courts Article.
(d–1) “Compact physician” means a physician licensed under the Interstate Medical
Licensure Compact established under § 14–3A–01 of this title.
(e) (1) “Cosmetic surgical procedure” means the use of surgical services to
reshape the structure of a human body in order to change the appearance of an individual.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, “cosmetic
surgical procedure” does not include:
(i) A procedure done under local anesthesia or mild sedation; or
(ii) Liposuction that removes less than 1,000 cubic centimeters of
aspirate.
(3) “Cosmetic surgical procedure” includes any procedure under paragraph
(2) of this subsection that, under the circumstances established by the Secretary in
regulations adopted under Title 19, Subtitle 3C of the Health – General Article, is a
cosmetic surgical procedure.
(e–1) “Disciplinary panel” means a disciplinary panel of the Board established
under § 14–401 of this title.
(E–2) “EMPLOYER” MEANS A PERSON THAT ENTERS AN ARRANGEMENT FOR
PROFESSIONAL SERVICES, WHETHER PAID OR UNPAID OR CONTRACTUAL OR
OTHERWISE, WITH AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE OR TITLE 15 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(f) “Hospital” has the meaning stated in § 19–301 of the Health – General Article.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(g) “License” means, unless the context requires otherwise, a license issued by the
Board to practice medicine OR AN ALLIED HEALTH PROFESSION REGULATED BY THE
BOARD.
(h) “Licensed physician” means, unless the context requires otherwise, a
physician, including a doctor of osteopathy, who is licensed by the Board to practice
medicine.
(i) “Licensee” means an individual to whom THE BOARD ISSUES a license [is
issued], including an individual practicing medicine within or as a professional corporation
or professional association.
(j) “MedChi” means the Maryland State Medical Society.
(k) “Mild sedation” means a drug–induced state during which:
(1) A patient is able to respond to verbal commands;
(2) A patient’s ventilatory and cardiovascular functions are not affected;
and
(3) A patient’s cognitive function and coordination may be impaired.
(l) “Perform acupuncture” means to stimulate a certain point or points on or near
the surface of the human body by the insertion of needles to prevent or modify the
perception of pain or to normalize physiological functions, including pain control, for the
treatment of ailments or conditions of the body.
(m) “Physician” means an individual who practices medicine.
[(n) “Physician Rehabilitation Program” means the program of the Board or the
nonprofit entity with which the Board contracts under § 14–401.1(g) of this title that
evaluates and provides assistance to impaired physicians and other health professionals
regulated by the Board who are directed by the Board to receive treatment and
rehabilitation for alcoholism, chemical dependency, or other physical, emotional, or mental
conditions.]
(N) “PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED UNDER
TITLE 15 OF THIS ARTICLE TO PRACTICE AS A PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT.
(o) (1) “Practice medicine” means to engage, with or without compensation, in
medical:
(i) Diagnosis;
(ii) Healing;
– 5 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) Treatment; or
(iv) Surgery.
(2) “Practice medicine” includes doing, undertaking, professing to do, and
attempting any of the following:
(i) Diagnosing, healing, treating, preventing, prescribing for, or
removing any physical, mental, or emotional ailment or supposed ailment of an individual:
1. By physical, mental, emotional, or other process that is
exercised or invoked by the practitioner, the patient, or both; or
2. By appliance, test, drug, operation, or treatment;
(ii) Ending of a human pregnancy; and
(iii) Performing acupuncture as provided under § 14–504 of this title.
(3) “Practice medicine” does not include:
(i) Selling any nonprescription drug or medicine;
(ii) Practicing as an optician; or
(iii) Performing a massage or other manipulation by hand, but by no
other means.
(p) “Registered cardiovascular invasive specialist” means an individual who is
credentialed by Cardiovascular Credentialing International or another credentialing body
approved by the Board to assist in cardiac catheterization procedures IN A HOSPITAL
under the direct, in–person supervision of a licensed physician.
(Q) “REHABILITATION PROGRAM” MEANS THE PROGRAM OF THE BOARD
OR THE NONPROFIT ENTITY WITH WHICH THE BOARD CONTRACTS UNDER §
14–401.1(G) OF THIS TITLE THAT EVALUATES AND PROVIDES ASSISTANCE TO
IMPAIRED PHYSICIANS AND ALLIED HEALTH PROFESSIONALS WHO ARE DIRECTED
BY THE BOARD TO RECEIVE TREATMENT AND REHABILITATION FOR ALCOHOLISM,
CHEMICAL DEPENDENCY, OR OTHER PHYSICAL, EMOTIONAL, OR MENTAL
CONDITIONS.
[(q)] (R) “Related institution” has the meaning stated in § 19–301 of the Health
– General Article.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
[14–101.1.
The Board may approve a public or private board including a multidisciplinary board
as a certifying board only if the certifying board requires that, in order to be certified, a
physician:
(1) Complete a postgraduate training program that:
(i) Provides complete training in the specialty or subspecialty being
certified; and
(ii) Is accredited by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical
Education or the American Osteopathic Association; and
(2) Be certified by the American Board of Medical Specialties or the
American Osteopathic Association in the same training field.]
14–205.
(b) (2) The Board or a disciplinary panel may investigate an alleged violation
of this title AND TITLE 15 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) Subject to the Administrative Procedure Act and the hearing provisions
of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel may deny a license to an applicant or, if an
applicant has failed to renew the applicant’s license, refuse to renew or reinstate an
applicant’s license for:
(i) Any of the reasons that are grounds for action under § 14–404, §
14–5A–17, § 14–5B–14, § 14–5C–17, § 14–5D–14, § 14–5E–16, [or] § 14–5F–18, OR §
14–5G–18 of this title, as applicable; or
(ii) Failure to complete a criminal history records check in
accordance with § 14–308.1 of this title.
(c) (1) In addition to the duties set forth elsewhere in this title, the Board
shall:
(i) Issue, for use in other jurisdictions, a certificate of professional
standing AND A VERIFICATION OF LICENSE STATUS to any [licensed physician]
LICENSEE; and
(ii) Keep a list of all PENDING license applicants.
(2) (i) The Board shall keep a list of all [physicians] LICENSEES who
are currently licensed.
– 7 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) The list shall include each [physician’s] LICENSEE’S designated
public address.
(iii) A [physician’s] LICENSEE’S designated public address may be a
post office box only if the [physician] LICENSEE provides to the Board a nonpublic address,
under paragraph (3) of this subsection, that is not a post office box.
(iv) [Each list prepared under this paragraph shall be kept as a
permanent record of the Board.
(v)] The list of [currently licensed physicians] CURRENT
LICENSEES is a public record.
(3) (i) The Board shall [maintain on file a physician’s] COLLECT A
LICENSEE’S designated nonpublic address, if provided by the [physician] LICENSEE, to
facilitate communication between the [physician] LICENSEE and the Board.
(ii) The Board shall offer a [physician] LICENSEE the opportunity to
designate a nonpublic address, in addition to the [physician’s] LICENSEE’S public address,
at the time of initial licensure and license renewal.
(iii) A [physician] LICENSEE shall designate an address where the
Board may send the [physician] LICENSEE mail.
(iv) A [physician’s] LICENSEE’S designated nonpublic address is not
a public record and may not be released by the Board.
(D) THE BOARD MAY NOT RELEASE A LIST OF APPLICANTS FOR LICENSURE.
(E) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE SPECIFIED IN STATUTE, THE BOARD MAY ADOPT
REGULATIONS REGARDING ADVISORY COMMITTEES ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS
TITLE AND TITLE 15 OF THIS ARTICLE GOVERNING:
(1) THE TERM OF OFFICE FOR MEMBERS;
(2) THE PROCEDURES FOR FILLING VACANCIES ON AN ADVISORY
COMMITTEE;
(3) THE REMOVAL OF MEMBERS; AND
(4) THE DUTIES OF EACH OFFICER.
14–206.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(d) (1) If the entry is necessary to carry out a duty under this title OR TITLE
15 OF THIS ARTICLE, the Board’s executive director or other duly authorized agent or
investigator of the Board may enter at any reasonable hour:
(i) A place of business of a [licensed physician] LICENSEE; or
(ii) Public premises.
(2) A person may not deny or interfere with an entry under this subsection.
(3) A person who violates [any provision of] this subsection is guilty of a
misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to a fine [not exceeding $100] OF $1,000.
(e) A disciplinary panel may issue a cease and desist order or obtain injunctive
relief against an individual for:
(1) Practicing a profession regulated under this title or Title 15 of this
article without a license OR WITH AN UNAUTHORIZED PERSON;
(2) Representing to the public, by title, description of services, methods,
procedures, or otherwise, that the individual is authorized to practice:
(i) Medicine in this State, in violation of § 14–602 of this title;
(ii) Respiratory care in this State, in violation of § 14–5A–21 of this
title;
(iii) Radiation therapy, radiography, nuclear medicine technology, or
radiation assistance in this State, in violation of § 14–5B–18 of this title;
(iv) Polysomnography in this State, in violation of § 14–5C–21 of this
title;
(v) Athletic training in this State, in violation of § 14–5D–17(3) of
this title;
(vi) Perfusion in this State, in violation of § 14–5E–21 of this title;
(vii) Naturopathic medicine in this State, in violation of § 14–5F–30
of this title; [or]
(VIII) GENETIC COUNSELING IN THIS STATE, IN VIOLATION OF §
14–5G–24 OF THIS TITLE; OR
[(viii)] (IX) As a physician assistant in this State, in violation of §
15–402 of this article; or
– 9 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) Taking any action:
(i) For which a disciplinary panel determines there is a
preponderance of evidence of grounds for discipline under § 14–404, § 14–5A–17, §
14–5B–14, § 14–5C–17, § 14–5E–16, § 14–5F–18, OR § 14–5G–18 of this title OR §
15–415 OF THIS ARTICLE; and
(ii) That poses a serious risk to the health, safety, and welfare of a
patient.
14–207.
(a) There is a Board of Physicians Fund.
(b) (1) The Board may set reasonable fees for the issuance and renewal of
licenses and its other services PROVIDED TO APPLICANTS OR LICENSEES.
(2) The fees charged shall be set [so as] to GENERATE SUFFICIENT
FUNDS TO approximate the cost of maintaining the Board, THE LICENSE PROGRAMS
UNDER THIS TITLE AND TITLE 15 OF THIS ARTICLE, AND THE OTHER SERVICES IT
PROVIDES TO APPLICANTS AND LICENSEES, including the cost of providing a
rehabilitation program [for physicians] under § 14–401.1(g) of this title.
(3) Funds to cover the compensation and expenses of the Board members
shall be generated by fees set under this section.
(4) A FEE COLLECTED UNDER THIS SECTION, THIS TITLE, OR TITLE
15 OF THIS ARTICLE SHALL BE USED TO COVER THE ACTUAL DOCUMENTED DIRECT
AND INDIRECT COSTS OF FULFILLING THE STATUTORY AND REGULATORY DUTIES
OF THE BOARD ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS TITLE AND TITLE 15 OF THIS ARTICLE
FOR THE PRACTITIONER TYPE OF THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE FROM WHOM THE
FEE WAS COLLECTED.
(c) The Board shall pay all fees collected under [the provisions of] this title to the
Comptroller of the State.
(d) (1) [In each of fiscal years 2019 through 2021, if the Governor does not
include in the State budget at least $400,000 for the operation of the Maryland Loan
Assistance Repayment Program for Physicians and Physician Assistants under Title 24,
Subtitle 17 of the Health – General Article, as administered by the Department, the
Comptroller shall distribute:
(i) $400,000 of the fees received from the Board to the Department
to be used to make grants under the Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program for
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
Physicians and Physician Assistants under Title 24, Subtitle 17 of the Health – General
Article to physicians and physician assistants engaged in primary care or to medical
residents specializing in primary care who agree to practice for at least 2 years as primary
care physicians in a geographic area of the State that has been designated by the Secretary
as being medically underserved; and
(ii) The balance of the fees to the Board of Physicians Fund.
(2) In fiscal year 2022, if the Governor does not include in the State budget
at least $1,000,000 for the operation of the Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program
for Physicians and Physician Assistants under Title 24, Subtitle 17 of the Health – General
Article, as administered by the Department, the Comptroller shall distribute:
(i) $1,000,000 of the fees received from the Board to the Department
to be used to make grants under the Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program for
Physicians and Physician Assistants under Title 24, Subtitle 17 of the Health – General
Article to physicians and physician assistants engaged in primary care or to medical
residents specializing in primary care who agree to practice for at least 2 years as primary
care physicians in a geographic area of the State that has been designated by the Secretary
as being medically underserved; and
(ii) The balance of the fees to the Board of Physicians Fund.
(3)] In fiscal year 2023 and each fiscal year thereafter, if the Department
does not implement a permanent funding structure under § 24–1702(b)(1) of the
Health – General Article and the Governor does not include in the State budget at least
$400,000 for the operation of the Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program for
Physicians and Physician Assistants under Title 24, Subtitle 17 of the Health – General
Article, as administered by the Department, the Comptroller shall distribute:
(i) $400,000 of the fees received from the Board to the Department
to be used to make grants under the Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program for
Physicians and Physician Assistants under Title 24, Subtitle 17 of the Health – General
Article to physicians and physician assistants engaged in primary care or to medical
residents specializing in primary care who agree to practice for at least 2 years as primary
care physicians in a geographic area of the State that has been designated by the Secretary
as being medically underserved; and
(ii) The balance of the fees to the Board of Physicians Fund.
[(4)] (2) If the Governor includes in the State budget at least the amount
specified in paragraph (1) [or (2)] of this subsection for the operation of the Maryland Loan
Assistance Repayment Program for Physicians and Physician Assistants under Title 24,
Subtitle 17 of the Health – General Article, as administered by the Department, the
Comptroller shall distribute the fees to the Board of Physicians Fund.
– 11 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(e) (1) The Fund shall be used exclusively to cover the actual documented
direct and indirect costs of fulfilling the statutory and regulatory duties of the Board as
provided by [the provisions of] this title.
(2) (i) The Fund is a continuing, nonlapsing fund, not subject to §
7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(ii) Any unspent portions of the Fund may not be transferred or
revert to the General Fund of the State, but shall remain in the Fund to be used for the
purposes specified in this title.
(3) Interest or other income earned on the investment of money in the Fund
shall be paid into the Fund.
(4) No other State money may be used to support the Fund.
(f) [(1)] In addition to the requirements of subsection (e) of this section, the
Board shall fund the budget of the [Physician] Rehabilitation Program with fees set,
collected, and distributed to the Fund under this title.
[(2) After review and approval by the Board of a budget submitted by the
Physician Rehabilitation Program, the Board may allocate money from the Fund to the
Physician Rehabilitation Program.]
(g) (1) The chair of the Board or the designee of the chair shall administer the
Fund.
(2) Money in the Fund may be expended only for any lawful purpose
authorized by [the provisions of] this title.
(h) The Legislative Auditor shall audit the accounts and transactions of the Fund
as provided in § 2–1220 of the State Government Article.
14–208.
(A) THE BOARD MAY IMPOSE AN ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY NOT
EXCEEDING $25,000 $15,000 ON A LICENSEE FOR:
(1) FAILURE TO PRODUCE ALL DOCUMENTS IN RESPONSE TO A
BOARD SUBPOENA;
(2) DISPENSING A DRUG WITHOUT THE PROPER AUTHORITY FROM A
VALID DISPENSING PERMIT; AND
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(3) FAILURE TO COMPLETE A SUPPLEMENTAL APPLICATION FOR A
LICENSE COMPACT.
(B) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING THE
ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTIES LISTED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) THE BOARD SHALL PAY ANY PENALTY COLLECTED UNDER THIS
SECTION TO THE BOARD OF PHYSICIANS FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 14–207 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
14–302.
Subject to the rules, regulations, and orders of the Board, the following individuals
may practice medicine without a license:
(2) A physician licensed by and residing in another jurisdiction, if the
physician:
(iii) Is engaged in clinical training or participates in training or
teaching of a skill or procedure in a hospital if:
4. The visiting physician has no history of any medical
disciplinary action in any other state, territory, nation, or any branch of the United States
uniformed services or the [Veterans Administration] U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS
AFFAIRS, and has no significant detrimental malpractice history;
(3) A physician employed in the service of the federal government while
[performing the duties incident to that] PRACTICING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THE
employment;
14–306.
(g) (1) (iii) “Supervised medical graduate” means an individual who:
2. Has passed parts 1 and 2 of the:
A. United States Medical Licensing Examination; OR
B. COMPREHENSIVE OSTEOPATHIC MEDICAL
LICENSING EXAMINATION OF THE UNITED STATES.
14–307.
– 13 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(e) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, the applicant shall [pass an
examination required] MEET ANY EDUCATION, CERTIFICATION, TRAINING, OR
EXAMINATION REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED by the Board.
(h) (1) The Board shall require as part of its examination or licensing
procedures that an applicant for a license to practice medicine demonstrate an oral AND
WRITTEN competency in the English language.
(2) Graduation from a recognized English–speaking undergraduate school
or high school, including General Education Development (GED), after at least 3 years of
enrollment, or from a recognized English–speaking professional school is acceptable as
proof of proficiency in the oral AND WRITTEN communication of the English language
under this section.
(3) By regulation, the Board shall develop a procedure for testing
individuals who because of their speech impairment are unable to complete satisfactorily a
Board approved standardized test of oral competency.
(4) If any disciplinary charges or action that involves a problem with the
oral AND WRITTEN communication of the English language are brought against a licensee
under this title, the Board shall require the licensee to take and pass a Board approved
standardized test of oral AND WRITTEN competency.
14–308.
(a) (1) In this section the following terms have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Fifth pathway program” means a program that the Board approves in
its regulations for a student who:
(i) Has studied medicine at [a foreign] AN INTERNATIONAL
medical school;
(ii) Was a United States citizen when the student enrolled in the
[foreign] INTERNATIONAL medical school; and
(iii) Has completed all of the formal requirements for graduation
from the [foreign] INTERNATIONAL medical school, except for any social service or
postgraduate requirements.
(3) [“Foreign] “INTERNATIONAL medical school” means a medical school
located outside of the United States, its territories or possessions, Puerto Rico, or Canada.
(b) An applicant for a license is exempt from the educational requirements of §
14–307 of this subtitle, if the applicant:
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(1) Has studied medicine at [a foreign] AN INTERNATIONAL medical
school;
(2) Is certified by the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical
Graduates or by its successor as approved by the Board;
(3) Passes a qualifying examination for [foreign] INTERNATIONAL
medical school graduates required by the Board;
(4) Meets any other qualifications for [foreign] INTERNATIONAL medical
school graduates that the Board establishes in its regulation for licensing of applicants;
(5) Submits acceptable evidence to the Board of the requirements set in the
Board’s regulations; and
(6) Meets one of the following requirements:
(i) The applicant graduated from any [foreign] INTERNATIONAL
medical school and submits evidence acceptable to the Board of successful completion of 2
years of training in a postgraduate medical education program accredited by an accrediting
organization recognized by the Board; or
(ii) The applicant successfully completed a fifth pathway program
and submits evidence acceptable to the Board that the applicant:
1. Has a document issued by the [foreign] INTERNATIONAL
medical school certifying that the applicant completed all of the formal requirements of
that school for the study of medicine, except for the postgraduate or social service
components as required by the [foreign] INTERNATIONAL country or its medical school;
2. Has successfully completed a fifth pathway program; and
3. Has successfully completed 2 years of training in a
postgraduate medical education program following completion of a Board approved fifth
pathway program.
14–309.
[(a)] To apply for a license, an applicant shall:
(1) Complete a criminal history records check in accordance with §
14–308.1 of this subtitle;
(2) Submit an application to the Board on the form that the Board requires;
and
– 15 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) Pay to the Board the application fee set by the Board.
[(b) The Board may not release a list of applicants for licensure.]
14–315.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, each license issued under
this section expires on [the second anniversary of the date on which it is issued] A DATE
SET BY THE BOARD and may be renewed [every 2 years on application to] FOR A TERM
SET BY the Board.
14–316.
(a) (3) A license expires on a date set by the Board, unless the license is
renewed for [a] AN ADDITIONAL term as provided in this section.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, at least 1 month before the
license expires, the Board shall send to the licensee, by electronic or first–class mail to the
last known electronic or physical address of the licensee[:
(i) A] A renewal notice that states:
[1.] (I) The date on which the current license expires;
[2.] (II) The date by which the renewal application must be
received by the Board for the renewal to be issued and mailed before the license expires;
and
[3.] (III) The amount of the renewal fee[; and
(ii) A blank panel data sheet supplied by the Health Care
Alternative Dispute Resolution Office].
(c) (1) Before the license expires, the licensee periodically may renew it for an
additional term, if the licensee:
(i) Otherwise is entitled to be licensed;
(ii) Is of good moral character;
(iii) Pays to the Board a renewal fee set by the Board; [and]
(iv) Submits to the Board:
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
1. A renewal application on the form that the Board requires;
and
2. Satisfactory evidence of compliance with any continuing
education OR COMPETENCY requirements set under this section for license renewal; AND
(V) MEETS ANY ADDITIONAL LICENSE RENEWAL
REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD.
(d) (1) In addition to any other qualifications and requirements established by
the Board, the Board may establish continuing education OR COMPETENCY requirements
as a condition to the renewal of licenses under this section.
(f) (1) [Each] A licensee shall notify [the secretary of] the Board in writing of
[any] A change [in the licensee’s] IN name or address within [60] 10 30 days after the
change.
(2) [If a] A licensee WHO fails to [notify the secretary of the Board within
the time required under this section, the licensee] COMPLY WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION is subject to an administrative penalty of $100.
14–317.
The Board shall reinstate the license of a physician who has failed to renew the
license for any reason, is on inactive status under § 14–320 of this subtitle, or is on emeritus
status under § 14–320.1 of this subtitle if the physician:
(1) Meets the renewal requirements of § 14–316 of this subtitle;
(2) SUBMITS A REINSTATEMENT APPLICATION ON THE FORM THAT
THE BOARD REQUIRES;
[(2)] (3) Pays to the Board a reinstatement fee set by the Board; [and]
[(3)] (4) Submits to the Board satisfactory evidence of compliance with
the qualifications and requirements established under this title for license reinstatements;
AND
(5) MEETS ANY ADDITIONAL LICENSE REINSTATEMENT
REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD.
14–3A–01.
SECTION 5. APPLICATION AND ISSUANCE OF EXPEDITED LICENSURE
– 17 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(f) An expedited license obtained [though] THROUGH the Compact shall be
terminated if a physician fails to maintain a license in the state of principal license for a
nondisciplinary reason, without redesignation of a new state of principal license.
14–401.
(a) There are two disciplinary panels [through which allegations of grounds for
disciplinary action against a licensed physician or an allied health professional shall be
resolved] RESPONSIBLE FOR RESOLVING ALLEGATIONS OF VIOLATIONS OF THIS
TITLE AND TITLE 15 OF THIS ARTICLE.
14–401.1.
(a) (5) (i) If a complaint proceeds to a hearing under § 14–405 of this
subtitle, § 14–5A–17, § 14–5B–14, § 14–5C–17, § 14–5D–15, § 14–5E–16, [or] § 14–5F–21,
OR § 14–5G–18 of this title, or § 15–315 of this article, the chair of the disciplinary panel
that was assigned the complaint under paragraph (2)(i) of this subsection shall refer the
complaint to the [other disciplinary panel] OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS.
(ii) If the [complaint proceeds to a hearing and is referred to the
other disciplinary panel under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph,] DISCIPLINARY PANEL
RESCINDS ITS REFERRAL OF THE COMPLAINT TO THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE
HEARINGS, the COMPLAINT WILL RETURN TO THE ORIGINAL disciplinary panel that
was assigned the complaint under paragraph (2)(i) of this subsection.
(III) AFTER AN EVIDENTIARY HEARING AT THE OFFICE OF
ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS, THE CHAIR OF THE ORIGINAL DISCIPLINARY PANEL
THAT WAS ASSIGNED THE COMPLAINT UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(I) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL REFER THE COMPLAINT TO THE OTHER DISCIPLINARY PANEL
FOR FURTHER ACTION.
(IV) AFTER AN EVIDENTIARY HEARING AT THE OFFICE OF
ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS, THE ORIGINAL DISCIPLINARY PANEL THAT WAS
ASSIGNED THE COMPLAINT UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION, or any
of its members, may not:
1. Continue to handle the complaint;
2. Participate in any disciplinary proceedings regarding the
complaint; or
3. Determine the final disposition of the complaint.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(f) (1) The entity or individual peer reviewer with which the Board contracts
under subsection (e) of this section shall have [90] 60 days for completion of peer review.
(2) The entity or individual peer reviewer may apply to the Board for an
extension of up to [30] 20 days to the time limit imposed under paragraph (1) of this
subsection.
(3) If an extension is not granted, and [90] 60 days have elapsed, the Board
may contract with any other entity or individual who meets the requirements of subsection
(e)(2) of this section for the services of peer review.
(4) If an extension has been granted, and [120] 80 days have elapsed, the
Board may contract with any other entity or individual who meets the requirements of
subsection (e)(2) of this section for the services of peer review.
14–402.
(a) In reviewing an application for licensure or in investigating an allegation
brought against a licensed physician or any allied health professional regulated by the
Board under this title OR TITLE 15 OF THIS ARTICLE, the [Physician] Rehabilitation
Program may request the Board to direct, or the Board or a disciplinary panel on its own
initiative may direct, the licensed physician or any allied health professional regulated by
the Board under this title OR TITLE 15 OF THIS ARTICLE to submit to an appropriate
examination.
(b) In return for the privilege given by the State issuing a license, certification, or
registration, the licensed, certified, or registered individual is deemed to have:
(1) Consented to submit to an examination under this section, if requested
by the Board in writing; and
(2) Waived any claim of privilege as to the testimony or examination
reports.
(c) The unreasonable failure or refusal of the [licensed individual] APPLICANT
OR LICENSEE to submit to an examination is prima facie evidence of the [licensed
individual’s] APPLICANT’S OR LICENSEE’S inability to practice medicine or the respective
discipline competently, unless the Board or disciplinary panel finds that the failure or
refusal was beyond the control of the [licensed individual] APPLICANT OR LICENSEE.
(d) The Board shall pay the costs of any examination made under this section
FOR:
(1) A LICENSEE; OR
– 19 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) AN APPLICANT WHO WAS NOT PREVIOUSLY LICENSED BY THE
BOARD.
[(e) (1) The Board or the entity or entities with which the Board contracts shall
appoint the members of the Physician Rehabilitation Program.
(2) The chair of the Board shall appoint one member of the Board to serve
as a liaison to the Physician Rehabilitation Program.]
(E) AN APPLICANT FOR REINSTATEMENT SHALL PAY THE COST OF ANY
EXAMINATION DIRECTED BY THE BOARD UNDER THIS SECTION.
(f) The [Physician] Rehabilitation Program is subject to audit by the Legislative
Auditor as provided in § 2–1220 of the State Government Article.
14–403.
(a) Unless a disciplinary panel agrees to accept the surrender of a license,
certification, or registration of an individual the Board regulates, the individual may not
surrender the license, certification, or registration nor may the license, certification, or
registration lapse by operation of law FOR PURPOSES OF INVESTIGATION OR
DISCIPLINE while the individual is under investigation or while charges are pending.
14–404.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this subtitle, a disciplinary
panel, on the affirmative vote of a majority of the quorum of the disciplinary panel, may
reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or suspend or revoke a license if
the licensee:
(4) Is [professionally, physically, or mentally]:
(I) PROFESSIONALLY INCOMPETENT;
(II) PHYSICALLY INCOMPETENT; OR
(III) MENTALLY incompetent;
(19) [Grossly overutilizes] ESTABLISHES A PATTERN OF
OVERUTILIZATION OF health care services EXCESSIVE OR MEDICALLY UNNECESSARY
PROCEDURES OR TREATMENT;
(25) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY fails to report suspected child abuse in
violation of § 5–704 of the Family Law Article;
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(37) [By corrupt means, threats, or force, intimidates] INTIMIDATES or
influences, or attempts to intimidate or influence, for the purpose of causing any person to
withhold or change testimony in hearings or proceedings before the Board or a disciplinary
panel or those otherwise delegated to the Office of Administrative Hearings;
(38) [By corrupt means, threats, or force, hinders] HINDERS WILLFULLY
HINDERS, prevents, or otherwise delays any person from making information available to
the Board or a disciplinary panel in furtherance of any investigation of the Board or a
disciplinary panel;
(45) Fails to comply with § 1–223 of this article; [or]
(46) Fails to comply with the requirements of the Prescription Drug
Monitoring Program under Title 21, Subtitle 2A of the Health – General Article; OR
(47) WILLFULLY MAKES A MISREPRESENTATION TO A DISCIPLINARY
PANEL.
14–405.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in the Administrative Procedure Act, before the
Board or a disciplinary panel takes any action under § 14–404(a) of this subtitle or §
14–205(b)(3), § 14–5A–17(a), § 14–5B–14(a), § 14–5C–17(a), § 14–5D–14(a), § 14–5E–16(a),
[or] § 14–5F–18, OR § 14–5G–18(A) of this title, it shall give the individual against whom
the action is contemplated an opportunity for a hearing before a hearing officer.
14–409.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a disciplinary panel
may reinstate the license of an individual whose license has been surrendered or revoked
under this title only in accordance with:
(i) The terms and conditions of the order of revocation or letter of
surrender;
(ii) An order of reinstatement issued by the disciplinary panel; or
(iii) A final judgment in any proceeding for review.
(2) If a license is surrendered or revoked for a period of more than 1 year,
[the Board] A DISCIPLINARY PANEL may reinstate the license after 1 year if the licensee:
(i) Meets the requirements for reinstatement as established by the
Board; and
– 21 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) Completes a criminal history records check in accordance with §
14–308.1 of this title.
14–411.
(a) In this section, “record” means the proceedings, records, or files of the Board
or a disciplinary panel.
(b) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this section and § 14–411.1 of this
subtitle, the Board, a disciplinary panel, or any of its other investigatory bodies may not
disclose any information contained in a record.
(c) [Nothing in this] THIS section [shall] MAY NOT be construed to prevent or
limit the disclosure of:
(1) General licensure, certification, or registration information maintained
by the Board, if the request for release complies with the criteria of § 4–333 of the General
Provisions Article;
(2) Profile information collected and disseminated under § 14–411.1 of this
subtitle; or
(3) Personal and other identifying information of a licensee, as required by
the National Practitioner Data Bank for participation in the proactive disclosure service.
(d) The Board shall disclose any information contained in a record to:
(1) A committee of a hospital, health maintenance organization, or related
institution if:
(i) The committee of a medical hospital staff concerned with
[physician] LICENSEE discipline or other committee of a hospital, health maintenance
organization, or related institution requests the information in writing;
(ii) A disciplinary panel has issued an order as to a [licensed
physician] LICENSEE on whom the information is requested; and
(iii) The Board determines that the information requested is
necessary for an investigation or action of the committee as to a medical privilege of a
[licensed physician] LICENSEE; or
(2) The Secretary, the Office of Health Care Quality in the Department,
the Maryland Health Care Commission, or the Health Services Cost Review Commission
for the purpose of investigating quality or utilization of care in any entity regulated by the
Office of Health Care Quality or the Health Services Cost Review Commission.
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(e) [On or before January 1, 2013, the Board, the Secretary, the Maryland Health
Care Commission, and the Health Services Cost Review Commission jointly shall adopt
regulations for the efficient and secure transfer, under subsection (d)(2) of this section, of
any information in a record that may indicate that an investigation of an entity regulated
by the Office of Health Care Quality, the Maryland Health Care Commission, or the Health
Services Cost Review Commission may be appropriate.
(f)] Subsection (d)(2) of this section may not be construed to alter the authority of
the Secretary under § 1–203(a) of this article or § 2–106(c) of the Health – General Article.
[(g)] (F) (1) The Board shall notify all hospitals, health maintenance
organizations, or other health care facilities where a [physician or an allied health
professional regulated by the Board] LICENSEE has privileges, has a provider contract with
a health maintenance organization, or is employed of a complaint or report filed against
that [physician] LICENSEE, if:
(i) The Board determines, in its discretion, that the hospital, health
maintenance organization, or health care facility should be informed about the report or
complaint;
(ii) The nature of the complaint suggests a reasonable possibility of
an imminent threat to patient safety; or
(iii) The complaint or report was as a result of a claim filed in the
Health Care Alternative Dispute Resolution Office and a certificate of a qualified expert is
filed in accordance with § 3–2A–04(b)(1) of the Courts Article.
(2) The Board shall disclose any information pertaining to a [physician’s]
LICENSEE’S competency to practice [medicine] UNDER THE LICENSE contained in record
to a committee of a hospital, health maintenance organization, or other health care facility
if:
(i) The committee is concerned with [physician] LICENSEE
discipline and requests the information in writing; and
(ii) The Board has received a complaint or report pursuant to
paragraph (1)(i) and (ii) of this subsection on the [licensed physician] LICENSEE on whom
the information is requested.
(3) The Board shall, after formal action is taken pursuant to § 14–406 of
this subtitle, notify those hospitals, health maintenance organizations, or health care
facilities where the [physician] LICENSEE has privileges, has a provider contract with a
health maintenance organization, or is employed of its formal action within 10 days after
the action is taken and shall provide the hospital, health maintenance organization, or
health care facility with periodic reports as to enforcement or monitoring of a formal
– 23 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
disciplinary order against a [physician] LICENSEE within 10 days after receipt of those
reports.
[(h)] (G) On the request of a person who has made a complaint to the Board
regarding a [physician] LICENSEE, the Board shall provide the person with information
on the status of the complaint.
[(i)] (H) Following the filing of charges or notice of initial denial of license
application, the Board shall disclose the filing to the public on the Board’s website.
[(j)] (I) The Board may disclose any information contained in a record to a
licensing or disciplinary authority of another state if:
(1) The licensing or disciplinary authority of another state that regulates
[licensed physicians] LICENSEES in that state requests the information in writing; and
(2) The disclosure of any information is limited to the pendency of an
allegation of a ground for disciplinary or other action by a disciplinary panel until:
(i) The disciplinary panel has passed an order under § 14–406 of
this subtitle; or
(ii) A [licensed physician] LICENSEE on whom the information is
requested authorizes a disclosure as to the facts of an allegation or the results of an
investigation before the Board.
[(k)] (J) The Board may disclose any information contained in a record to a
person if:
(1) A [licensed physician] LICENSEE on whom any information is
requested authorizes the person to receive the disclosure;
(2) The person requests the information in writing; and
(3) The authorization for the disclosure is in writing.
[(l)] (K) The Board may disclose any information contained in a record to the
State Medical Assistance Compliance Administration, the Secretary of the U.S.
Department of Health and Human Services or the Secretary’s designee, or any health
occupational regulatory board if:
(1) (i) The State Medical Assistance Compliance Administration or any
health occupational regulatory board requests the information in writing; or
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(ii) The Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human
Services or the Secretary’s designee is entitled to receive the information or have access to
the information under 42 U.S.C. § 1396r–2;
(2) (i) A disciplinary panel has issued an order under § 14–406 of this
subtitle; or
(ii) An allegation is pending before the Board or a disciplinary panel;
and
(3) The Board determines that the requested information is necessary for
the proper conduct of the business of that administration or board.
[(m)] (L) If the Board or a disciplinary panel determines that the information
contained in a record concerns possible criminal activity, the Board or the disciplinary
panel shall disclose the information to a law enforcement or prosecutorial official.
[(n)] (M) The Board may permit inspection of records for which inspection
otherwise is not authorized by a person who is engaged in a research project if:
(1) The researcher submits to the executive director and the Board
approves a written request that:
(i) Describes the purpose of the research project;
(ii) Describes the intent, if any, to publish the findings;
(iii) Describes the nature of the requested personal records;
(iv) Describes the safeguards that the researcher would take to
protect the identity of the persons in interest; and
(v) States that persons in interest will not be contacted unless the
executive director approves and monitors the contact;
(2) The executive director is satisfied that the proposed safeguards will
prevent the disclosure of the identity of persons in interest; and
(3) The researcher makes an agreement with the executive director that:
(i) Defines the scope of the research project;
(ii) Sets out the safeguards for protecting the identity of the persons
in interest; and
– 25 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) States that a breach of any condition of the agreement is a breach
of contract.
[(o)] (N) On the request of a person who has testified in a Board or Office of
Administrative Hearings proceeding, the Board shall provide to the person who testified a
copy of the portion of the transcript of that person’s testimony.
[(p)] (O) (1) The Board may publish a summary of any allegations of grounds
for disciplinary or other action.
(2) A summary may not identify:
(i) Any person who makes an allegation to the Board or any of its
investigatory bodies;
(ii) A [licensed physician] LICENSEE about whom an allegation is
made; or
(iii) A witness in an investigation or a proceeding before the Board or
any of its investigatory bodies.
[(q)] (P) The Board shall disclose information in a record upon the request of the
Governor, Secretary, or Legislative Auditor, in accordance with § 2–1223(a) of the State
Government Article. However, the Governor, Secretary, or Auditor, or any of their
employees may not disclose personally identifiable information from any of these records
which are otherwise confidential by law.
[(r)] (Q) This section does not apply to:
(1) Any disclosure of a record by the Board to a disciplinary panel or any of
its other investigatory bodies; or
(2) A licensee, certificate holder, or registration holder who has been
charged under this title or a party to a proceeding before the Board or a disciplinary panel
who claims to be aggrieved by the decision of the Board or the disciplinary panel.
[(s)] (R) If any information contained in any medical or hospital document or
any other exhibit is otherwise open for disclosure under law, the use of that document or
exhibit in any record of the Board, a disciplinary panel, or any of its other investigatory
bodies does not prevent its disclosure in any other proceeding.
14–411.1.
(c) In addition to the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, the Board
shall:
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(1) FOLLOWING THE FILING OF CHARGES OR NOTICE OF INITIAL
DENIAL OF A LICENSE APPLICATION, DISCLOSE THE FILING TO THE PUBLIC ON THE
BOARD’S WEBSITE;
[(1)] (2) Provide appropriate and accessible Internet links from the
Board’s [Internet site] WEBSITE:
(i) To the extent available, to the appropriate portion of the
[Internet site] WEBSITE of each health maintenance organization licensed in this State
which will allow the public to ascertain the names of the physicians affiliated with the
health maintenance organization; and
(ii) To the appropriate portion of the [Internet site] WEBSITE of the
American Medical Association;
[(2)] (3) Include a statement on each licensee’s profile of information to
be taken into consideration by a consumer when viewing a licensee’s profile, including
factors to consider when evaluating a licensee’s malpractice data, and a disclaimer stating
that a charging document does not indicate a final finding of guilt by a disciplinary panel;
and
[(3)] (4) Provide on the Board’s [Internet site] WEBSITE:
(i) Notification that a person may contact the Board by telephone,
electronic mail, or written request to find out whether the number of medical malpractice
settlements involving a particular licensee totals three or more with a settlement amount
of [$150,000] $1,000,000 or greater within the most recent 5–year period as reported to
the Board; and
(ii) A telephone number, electronic mail address, and physical
address through which a person may contact the Board to request the information required
to be provided under item (i) of this item.
(d) The Board:
(2) Shall maintain a website that serves as a single point of entry where
all [physician] LICENSEE profile information is available to the public on the Internet; and
14–413.
(a) (1) [Each] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (D) OF
THIS SECTION, EACH hospital [and], related institution, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, AND EMPLOYER OF A LICENSED PHYSICIAN shall submit to the Board a report
[within 10 days] after:
– 27 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) The hospital [or], related institution, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER denied the application of a physician for staff privileges or
limited, reduced, otherwise changed, or terminated the staff privileges of a physician, or
the physician resigned whether or not under formal accusation, if the denial, limitation,
reduction, change, termination, or resignation is for reasons IF:
(I) THE EMPLOYER:
1. REDUCED, SUSPENDED, REVOKED, RESTRICTED,
DENIED, CONDITIONED, OR DID NOT RENEW THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN’S CLINICAL
PRIVILEGES, EMPLOYMENT, OR OTHER ABILITY TO PRACTICE OR TREAT PATIENTS;
2. INVOLUNTARILY TERMINATED OR RESTRICTED THE
LICENSED PHYSICIAN’S EMPLOYMENT OR STAFF MEMBERSHIP; OR
3. ASKED THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN TO VOLUNTARILY
RESIGN BECAUSE OF THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN’S CONDUCT OR WHILE THE
LICENSED PHYSICIAN IS BEING INVESTIGATED; AND
(II) THE ACTION DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH WAS TAKEN:
1. FOR REASONS that might be grounds for disciplinary
action under § 14–404 of this subtitle;
2. BECAUSE THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN MAY HAVE
ENGAGED IN AN ACT THAT MAY CONSTITUTE UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT;
3. BECAUSE THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN MAY BE UNABLE
TO PRACTICE MEDICINE WITH REASONABLE SKILL AND SAFETY BECAUSE OF A
PHYSICAL OR MENTAL CONDITION OR PROFESSIONAL INCOMPETENCE; OR
4. BECAUSE THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN MAY HAVE
HARMED OR PLACED ONE OR MORE PATIENTS OR THE PUBLIC AT UNREASONABLE
RISK OF HARM BY ENGAGING IN AN ACT THAT CREATES AN IMMEDIATE OR
CONTINUING DANGER.
(2) EACH REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE ACTION TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER;
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(II) A DETAILED EXPLANATION OF THE REASONS FOR THE
ACTION, INCLUDING REFERENCES TO SPECIFIC PATIENT MEDICAL RECORDS, IF
ANY, THAT INFORMED THE EMPLOYER’S ACTION; AND
(III) THE STEPS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER TO INVESTIGATE THE
CONDUCT OF THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN.
(3) (I) THE BOARD MAY REQUEST FROM THE EMPLOYER
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REGARDING AN ACTION DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT WAS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER.
(II) IF AN EMPLOYER RECEIVES A REQUEST MADE UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE EMPLOYER SHALL PROMPTLY
PROVIDE THE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION.
(ii) The hospital [or], related institution, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER took any disciplinary action against a salaried, licensed physician
without staff privileges, including termination of employment, suspension, or probation, for
reasons that might be grounds for disciplinary action under § 14–404 of this subtitle;
(iii) A licensed physician voluntarily resigned from the staff, employ,
or training program of the hospital [or], related institution, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER for reasons that might be grounds for disciplinary action under §
14–404 of this subtitle; or
(iv) The hospital [or], related institution, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER placed any other restrictions or conditions on any of the licensed
physicians as listed in items (i) through (iii) of this paragraph for any reasons that might
be grounds for disciplinary action under § 14–404 of this subtitle.
(2) The hospital [or], related institution, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER shall state in the report the reasons for its action or the nature
of the formal accusation pending when the physician resigned.
(3) The Board may extend the reporting time under this subsection for good
cause shown.
(4) The minutes or notes taken in the course of determining the denial,
limitation, reduction, or termination of the staff privileges of any physician in a hospital or
related institution are not subject to review or discovery by any person.
(5) The Board, in consultation with all interested parties, may adopt
regulations to define:
– 29 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Changes in employment or privileges that require reporting
under this section; and
(ii) Actions by licensees that are grounds for discipline and that
require reporting under this section.
(B) A HOSPITAL, A RELATED INSTITUTION, AN ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR IF AN EMPLOYER THAT HAS REASON TO KNOW THAT KNOWS THAT THE
CONDUCT OF A LICENSED PHYSICIAN HAS COMMITTED AN ACTION OR HAS A
CONDITION THAT MIGHT BE GROUNDS FOR REPRIMAND OR PROBATION OF THE
LICENSED PHYSICIAN OR SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF THE LICENSE REQUIRES
THAT THE EMPLOYER SUBMIT A REPORT UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS
SECTION BECAUSE THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN IS ALCOHOL–IMPAIRED OR
DRUG–IMPAIRED IMPAIRED BY ALCOHOL OR ANOTHER SUBSTANCE, THE EMPLOYER
IS NOT REQUIRED TO REPORT THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN TO THE BOARD IF:
(1) THE HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER KNOWS THAT THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN IS:
(I) IN AN ALCOHOL OR DRUG A SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER
TREATMENT PROGRAM THAT IS ACCREDITED BY THE JOINT COMMISSION OR IS
CERTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT; OR
(II) UNDER THE CARE OF A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER WHO
IS COMPETENT AND CAPABLE OF DEALING WITH ALCOHOLISM AND DRUG ABUSE
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS;
(2) THE HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER IS ABLE TO VERIFY THAT THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN
REMAINS IN THE TREATMENT PROGRAM UNTIL SUCCESSFUL DISCHARGE; AND
(3) THE ACTION OR CONDITION OF THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN HAS
NOT CAUSED INJURY TO ANY PERSON WHILE THE PRACTITIONER PHYSICIAN IS
PRACTICING AS A LICENSED PHYSICIAN.
(C) (1) IF THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN ENTERS OR IS CONSIDERING
ENTERING AN ALCOHOL OR DRUG TREATMENT PROGRAM THAT IS ACCREDITED BY
THE JOINT COMMISSION OR THAT IS CERTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT, THE
LICENSED PHYSICIAN SHALL NOTIFY THE HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION,
ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER THE
LICENSED PHYSICIAN’S DECISION TO ENTER THE TREATMENT PROGRAM.
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(2) IF THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN FAILS TO PROVIDE THE NOTICE
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AND THE HOSPITAL,
RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER LEARNS
THAT THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN HAS ENTERED A TREATMENT PROGRAM, THE
HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER
SHALL REPORT TO THE BOARD THAT THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN HAS ENTERED A
TREATMENT PROGRAM AND HAS FAILED TO PROVIDE THE REQUIRED NOTICE.
(3) IF THE TREATMENT PROGRAM FINDS THAT THE LICENSED
PHYSICIAN IS NONCOMPLIANT WITH THE TREATMENT PROGRAM’S POLICIES AND
PROCEDURES WHILE IN THE TREATMENT PROGRAM, THE TREATMENT PROGRAM
SHALL NOTIFY THE HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER OF THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN’S NONCOMPLIANCE.
(4) ON RECEIPT OF A NOTIFICATION MADE UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR IF THE EMPLOYER KNOWS THAT THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN IS
NONCOMPLIANT WITH THE SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT PROGRAM, THE
EMPLOYER OF THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN SHALL REPORT THE LICENSED
PHYSICIAN’S NONCOMPLIANCE TO THE BOARD.
(D) (1) THE BOARD MAY EXTEND THE REPORTING TIME UNDER THIS
SECTION FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN.
(D) (2) A PERSON IS NOT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION TO MAKE ANY
REPORT THAT WOULD BE IN VIOLATION OF ANY FEDERAL OR STATE LAW, RULE, OR
REGULATION CONCERNING THE CONFIDENTIALITY OF ALCOHOL AND DRUG ABUSE
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER PATIENT RECORDS.
[(b)] (E) The Board may enforce this section by subpoena.
[(c)] (F) Any person shall have the immunity from liability described under §
5–715(d) of the Courts and Judicial Proceedings Article for giving any of the information
required by this section.
(G) A HOSPITAL, A RELATED INSTITUTION, AN ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR AN AN EMPLOYER REQUIRED TO MAKE A REPORT TO THE BOARD UNDER
THIS SECTION SHALL SUBMIT THE REPORT WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE ACTION
REQUIRING THE REPORT.
[(d)] (H) A report made under this section is PRIVILEGED, NOT SUBJECT TO
INSPECTION UNDER THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT, AND not subject to subpoena or
discovery in any civil action other than a proceeding arising out of a hearing and decision
of the Board or a disciplinary panel under this title.
– 31 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(e)] (I) (1) A disciplinary panel may impose a civil penalty of up to [$5,000]
$10,000 for failure KNOWINGLY FAILING to report under this section.
(2) A DISCIPLINARY PANEL MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY OF
UP TO $10,000 PER INCIDENT FOR A REPORT MADE BY AN EMPLOYER IN BAD FAITH.
(3) The Board shall remit any penalty collected under this
subsection into the General Fund of the State.
[14–414.
(a) (1) Each alternative health system as defined in § 1–401 of this article shall
submit to the Board a report within 10 days after:
(i) The alternative health system denied the formal application of a
physician to contract with the alternative health system or limited, reduced, otherwise
changed, or terminated the contract of a physician, or the physician resigned whether or
not under formal accusation, if the denial, limitation, reduction, change, termination, or
resignation is for reasons that might be grounds for disciplinary action under § 14–404 of
this subtitle; or
(ii) The alternative health system placed any other restrictions or
conditions on any licensed physician for any reasons that might be grounds for disciplinary
action under § 14–404 of this subtitle.
(2) The alternative health system shall state in the report the reasons for
its action or the nature of the formal accusation pending when the physician resigned.
(3) The Board may extend the reporting time under this subsection for good
cause shown.
(4) The minutes or notes taken in the course of determining the denial,
limitation, reduction, or termination of the employment contract of any physician in an
alternative health system are not subject to review or discovery by any person.
(5) The Board, in consultation with all interested parties, may adopt
regulations to define:
(i) Changes in employment or privileges that require reporting
under this section; and
(ii) Actions by licensees that are grounds for discipline and require
reporting under this section.
(b) The Board may enforce this section by subpoena.
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(c) Any person shall have the immunity from liability described under § 5–715(d)
of the Courts and Judicial Proceedings Article for giving any of the information required by
this section.
(d) A report made under this section is not subject to subpoena or discovery in
any civil action other than a proceeding arising out of a hearing and decision of the Board
or a disciplinary panel under this title.
(e) (1) A disciplinary panel may impose a civil penalty of up to $5,000 for
failure to report under this section.
(2) The Board shall remit any penalty collected under this subsection into
the General Fund of the State.]
14–414.
(A) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE, A HOSPITAL, A
RELATED INSTITUTION, AN ALTERNATIVE HEALTH CARE SYSTEM, OR AN EMPLOYER
MAY NOT EMPLOY AN INDIVIDUAL TO PRACTICE MEDICINE WITHOUT A LICENSE.
(B) A DISCIPLINARY PANEL MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY IN AN AMOUNT
NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 $10,000 FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(C) THE BOARD SHALL REMIT ANY PENALTY COLLECTED UNDER THIS
SECTION INTO THE BOARD OF PHYSICIANS FUND.
14–5A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Committee” means the Respiratory Care [Professional Standards]
ADVISORY Committee established under § 14–5A–05 of this subtitle.
14–5A–05.
There is a Respiratory Care [Professional Standards] ADVISORY Committee within
the Board.
14–5A–06.
(a) The Committee consists of seven members appointed by the Board as follows:
(1) Three LICENSED respiratory care practitioners;
– 33 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) Three LICENSED physicians:
(i) One of whom is a specialist in thoracic surgery;
(ii) One of whom is a specialist in pulmonary medicine; and
(iii) One of whom is a specialist in anesthesiology; and
(3) One consumer member.
(B) EACH MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE LICENSED BY THE BOARD MUST BE
IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE BOARD.
[(b)] (C) The consumer member of the Committee:
(1) [Shall] MUST be a member of the general public;
(2) May not be or ever have been:
(i) A respiratory care practitioner;
(ii) Any OTHER health care professional; or
(iii) In training to be a respiratory care practitioner or other health
professional; and
(3) May not:
(i) Participate or ever have participated in a commercial or
professional field related to respiratory care;
(ii) Have a household member who participates in a commercial or
professional field related to respiratory care;
(iii) Have had within 2 years before appointment a financial interest
in a person regulated by the Board; or
(iv) Have had within 2 years before appointment a financial interest
in the provision of goods or services to respiratory care practitioners or to the field of
respiratory care.
(D) EACH MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE MUST BE A RESIDENT OF THE
STATE.
[(c)] (E) (1) The term of a member is 3 years.
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(2) The terms of members are staggered AS REQUIRED BY REGULATION.
(3) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies.
(4) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for the
rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(5) A MEMBER MAY NOT SERVE MORE THAN TWO CONSECUTIVE FULL
TERMS.
[(d)] (F) (1) From among its members, the Committee shall elect a chair once
every 2 years.
(2) The chair, or the chair’s designee, shall serve in an advisory capacity to
the Board as a representative of the Committee.
(G) A QUORUM OF THE COMMITTEE CONSISTS OF FOUR MEMBERS.
14–5A–07.
[(a)] In addition to the powers set forth elsewhere in this subtitle, the Committee
shall:
(1) SHALL:
(1) (I) Develop and recommend to the Board [regulations]:
(I) 1. REGULATIONS to carry out [the provisions of] this
subtitle; AND
(II) 2. ANY STATUTORY CHANGES THAT AFFECT THE
PROFESSION; AND
(2) (II) [Develop and recommend to the Board a code of ethics for the
practice of respiratory care for adoption by the Board;
(3) If requested, develop and recommend to the Board standards of care for
the practice of respiratory care;
(4) Develop and recommend to the Board the requirements for licensure as
a respiratory care practitioner;
– 35 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) Evaluate the credentials of applicants as necessary and recommend
licensure of applicants who fulfill the requirements for a license to practice respiratory care;
(6) Develop and recommend to the Board continuing education
requirements for license renewal;
(7) Provide the Board with recommendations concerning the practice of
respiratory care;
(8) Develop and recommend to the Board criteria related to the practice of
respiratory care in the home setting;
(9)] Keep a record of its [proceedings] MEETINGS; and
[(10) Submit an annual report to the Board.]
(3) ON REQUEST OF THE BOARD OR A DISCIPLINARY PANEL:
(2) MAY:
(I) PROVIDE RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING THE PRACTICE
OF RESPIRATORY CARE; AND
(II) ADVISE THE BOARD ON ANY OTHER MATTERS RELATED TO
RESPIRATORY CARE PRACTITIONERS.
[(b) The Board shall:
(1) Consider all recommendations of the Committee; and
(2) Provide to the Committee an annual report on the disciplinary matters
involving licensees.]
14–5A–08.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) [An individual] A RESPIRATORY CARE PRACTITIONER employed
[by] IN THE SERVICE OF the federal government [as a respiratory care practitioner] while
[the individual is] practicing within the scope of [that] THE employment;
14–5A–14.
(a) A licensee shall notify the Board in writing of a change in name or address
within [60] 10 30 days after the change.
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
14–5A–17.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(3) Is guilty of [unprofessional or immoral]:
(I) IMMORAL conduct in the practice of respiratory care; OR
(II) UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT IN THE PRACTICE OF
RESPIRATORY CARE;
(4) Is [professionally, physically, or mentally]:
(I) PROFESSIONALLY INCOMPETENT;
(II) PHYSICALLY INCOMPETENT; OR
(III) MENTALLY incompetent;
(14) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY makes a misrepresentation while practicing
respiratory care;
(15) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY practices respiratory care with an
unauthorized individual or aids an unauthorized individual in the practice of respiratory
care;
(19) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY submits false statements to collect fees for
which services are not provided;
(21) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY fails to report suspected child abuse in
violation of § 5–704 of the Family Law Article;
14–5A–18.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (d) of this section, [hospitals,
related institutions, alternative health systems as defined in § 1–401 of this article, and
employers] AN EMPLOYER OF A LICENSED RESPIRATORY CARE PRACTITIONER shall
[file with] SUBMIT TO the Board a report [that the hospital, related institution, alternative
health system, or employer limited, reduced, otherwise changed, or terminated any licensed
respiratory care practitioner for any] IF:
– 37 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) THE EMPLOYER:
1. REDUCED, SUSPENDED, REVOKED, RESTRICTED,
DENIED, CONDITIONED, OR DID NOT RENEW THE LICENSED RESPIRATORY CARE
PRACTITIONER’S CLINICAL PRIVILEGES, EMPLOYMENT, OR OTHER ABILITY TO
PRACTICE OR TREAT PATIENTS;
2. INVOLUNTARILY TERMINATED OR RESTRICTED THE
LICENSED RESPIRATORY CARE PRACTITIONER’S EMPLOYMENT OR STAFF
MEMBERSHIP; OR
3. ASKED THE LICENSED RESPIRATORY CARE
PRACTITIONER TO VOLUNTARILY RESIGN BECAUSE OF THE LICENSED RESPIRATORY
CARE PRACTITIONER’S CONDUCT OR WHILE THE LICENSED RESPIRATORY CARE
PRACTITIONER IS BEING INVESTIGATED; AND
(II) THE ACTION DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH WAS TAKEN:
1. FOR reasons that might be grounds for disciplinary action
under § 14–5A–17 of this subtitle;
2. BECAUSE THE LICENSED RESPIRATORY CARE
PRACTITIONER MAY HAVE ENGAGED IN AN ACT THAT MAY CONSTITUTE
UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT;
3. BECAUSE THE LICENSED RESPIRATORY CARE
PRACTITIONER MAY BE UNABLE TO PRACTICE RESPIRATORY CARE WITH
REASONABLE SKILL AND SAFETY BECAUSE OF A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL CONDITION
OR PROFESSIONAL INCOMPETENCE; OR
4. BECAUSE THE LICENSED RESPIRATORY CARE
PRACTITIONER MAY HAVE HARMED OR PLACED ONE OR MORE PATIENTS OR THE
PUBLIC AT UNREASONABLE RISK OF HARM BY ENGAGING IN AN ACT THAT CREATES
AN IMMEDIATE OR CONTINUING DANGER.
(2) A REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE ACTION TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER;
– 38 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(II) A DETAILED EXPLANATION OF THE REASONS FOR THE
ACTION, INCLUDING REFERENCES TO SPECIFIC PATIENT MEDICAL RECORDS, IF
ANY, THAT INFORMED THE EMPLOYER’S ACTION; AND
(III) THE STEPS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER TO INVESTIGATE THE
CONDUCT OF THE LICENSED RESPIRATORY CARE PRACTITIONER.
(3) (I) THE BOARD MAY REQUEST FROM THE EMPLOYER
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REGARDING AN ACTION DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT WAS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER.
(II) IF AN EMPLOYER RECEIVES A REQUEST MADE UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE EMPLOYER SHALL PROMPTLY
PROVIDE THE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION.
(b) [A hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or] IF AN employer
[that has reason to know that] KNOWS THAT THE CONDUCT OF a licensed respiratory
care practitioner [has committed an action or has a condition that might be grounds for
reprimand or probation of the licensed respiratory care practitioner or suspension or
revocation of the license] REQUIRES THAT THE EMPLOYER SUBMIT A REPORT UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION because the licensed respiratory care practitioner
is [alcohol impaired or drug] impaired BY ALCOHOL OR ANOTHER SUBSTANCE, THE
EMPLOYER is not required to report the RESPIRATORY CARE practitioner to the Board if:
(1) The [hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or]
employer knows that the licensed respiratory care practitioner is:
(i) In [an alcohol or drug] A SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER treatment
program that is accredited by [the] THE Joint Commission [on Accreditation of Healthcare
Organizations] or is certified by the Department; or
(ii) Under the care of a health care practitioner who is competent
and capable of dealing with [alcoholism and drug abuse] SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS;
(2) The [hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or]
employer is able to verify that the licensed respiratory care practitioner remains in the
treatment program until SUCCESSFUL discharge; and
(3) The action or condition of the licensed respiratory care practitioner has
not caused injury to any person while the RESPIRATORY CARE practitioner is practicing
as a licensed respiratory care practitioner.
(c) (1) If the licensed respiratory care practitioner enters, or is considering
entering, an alcohol or drug treatment program that is accredited by [the] THE Joint
– 39 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Commission [on Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations] or that is certified by the
Department, the licensed respiratory care practitioner shall notify the hospital, related
institution, alternative health system, or employer [of] WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER the
licensed respiratory care practitioner’s decision to enter the treatment program.
[(2) If the licensed respiratory care practitioner fails to provide the notice
required under paragraph (1) of this subsection, and the hospital, related institution,
alternative health system, or employer learns that the licensed respiratory care
practitioner has entered a treatment program, the hospital, related institution, alternative
health system, or employer shall report to the Board that the licensed respiratory care
practitioner has entered a treatment program and has failed to provide the required notice.
(3) If the licensed respiratory care practitioner is found to be noncompliant
with the treatment program’s policies and procedures while in the treatment program, the
treatment program shall notify the hospital, related institution, alternative health system,
or employer of the licensed respiratory care practitioner’s noncompliance.
(4) On receipt of the notification required under paragraph (3) of this
subsection, the hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or] IF THE
EMPLOYER KNOWS THAT THE LICENSED RESPIRATORY CARE PRACTITIONER IS
NONCOMPLIANT WITH THE SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT PROGRAM, THE
employer of the licensed respiratory care practitioner shall report the licensed respiratory
care practitioner’s noncompliance to the Board.
(d) (1) THE BOARD MAY EXTEND THE REPORTING UNDER THIS SECTION
FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN.
(2) A person is not required under this section to make any report that
would be in violation of any federal or State law, rule, or regulation concerning the
confidentiality of [alcohol and drug abuse] SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER patient records.
(E) THE BOARD MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION BY SUBPOENA.
(F) ANY PERSON SHALL HAVE THE IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY DESCRIBED
UNDER § 5–715(D) OF THE COURTS ARTICLE FOR GIVING ANY OF THE INFORMATION
REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION.
[(e)] (G) [The hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or] AN
employer REQUIRED TO MAKE A REPORT TO THE BOARD UNDER THIS SECTION shall
submit the report within 10 days [of any] AFTER THE action [described in this section]
REQUIRING THE REPORT.
[(f)] (H) A report made under this section is PRIVILEGED, NOT SUBJECT TO
INSPECTION UNDER THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT, AND not subject to subpoena or
– 40 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
discovery in any civil action other than a proceeding arising out of a hearing and decision
of the Board or a disciplinary panel under this title.
(g) (I) (1) A disciplinary panel may impose a civil penalty of up to [$1,000] $5,000
for failure KNOWINGLY FAILING to report under this section.
(2) A DISCIPLINARY PANEL MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY OF UP TO
$5,000 PER INCIDENT FOR A REPORT MADE BY AN EMPLOYER IN BAD FAITH.
(3) The Board shall remit any penalty collected under this subsection into
the General Fund of the State.
14–5A–22.1.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a licensed physician may not
employ or supervise an individual practicing respiratory care without a license.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a hospital, related institution,
alternative health system, or AN employer may not employ an individual practicing
respiratory care without a license.
(c) A disciplinary panel may impose a civil penalty of up to [$1,000] $5,000 for a
violation of this section.
14–5A–23.
(a) A person who violates [any provision of §§ 14–5A–20 through 14–5A–22.1] §
14–5A–20, § 14–5A–21, OR § 14–5A–22 of this subtitle is guilty of a misdemeanor and
on conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 1 year
or both.
(b) A person who violates [any provision of §§ 14–5A–20 through 14–5A–22.1] §
14–5A–20, § 14–5A–21, OR § 14–5A–22 of this subtitle is subject to a civil fine of not
more than $5,000 to be levied by a disciplinary panel.
(c) The Board shall pay any penalty collected under this section into the Board of
Physicians Fund.
14–5B–05.
(a) There is a Radiation Therapy, Radiography, Nuclear Medicine Technology,
and Radiology Assistance Advisory Committee within the Board.
(b) (1) The Committee consists of nine members appointed by the Board.
(2) Of the nine members:
– 41 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) One shall be a licensed physician who specializes in radiology;
(ii) One shall be a licensed physician who specializes in radiology
and who supervises a radiologist assistant;
(iii) One shall be a licensed physician who specializes in nuclear
medicine;
(iv) One shall be a licensed physician who specializes in radiation
oncology;
(v) One shall be a LICENSED radiation therapist;
(vi) One shall be a LICENSED radiographer;
(vii) One shall be a LICENSED radiologist assistant;
(viii) One shall be a LICENSED nuclear medicine technologist; and
(ix) One shall be a consumer member.
[(c) (1) From among its members, the Committee shall elect a chair once every
2 years.
(2) The chair, or the chair’s designee, shall serve in an advisory capacity to
the Board as a representative of the Committee.]
(C) EACH MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE LICENSED BY THE BOARD MUST BE
IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE BOARD.
(d) The consumer member of the Committee:
(1) [Shall] MUST be a member of the general public;
(2) May not be or ever have been [a]:
(I) A RADIATION THERAPIST, RADIOGRAPHER, RADIOLOGIST
ASSISTANT, OR NUCLEAR MEDICINE TECHNOLOGIST;
(II) ANY OTHER health care professional; or [in]
(III) IN training to be a RADIATION THERAPIST, RADIOGRAPHER,
RADIOLOGIST ASSISTANT, NUCLEAR MEDICINE TECHNOLOGIST, OR OTHER health
care professional; and
– 42 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(3) May not:
(i) Participate or ever have participated in a commercial or
professional field related to radiation therapy, radiography, nuclear medicine technology,
or radiology assistance;
(ii) Have a household member who participates in a commercial or
professional field related to radiation therapy, radiography, nuclear medicine technology,
or radiology assistance; [or]
(iii) Have had within 2 years before appointment a financial interest
in a person regulated by the Board; OR
(IV) HAVE HAD WITHIN 2 YEARS BEFORE APPOINTMENT A
FINANCIAL INTEREST IN THE PROVISION OF GOODS OR SERVICES TO RADIATION
THERAPISTS, RADIOGRAPHERS, RADIOLOGY ASSISTANTS, OR NUCLEAR MEDICINE
TECHNOLOGISTS OR TO THE FIELD OF RADIATION THERAPY, RADIOGRAPHY,
NUCLEAR MEDICINE TECHNOLOGY, OR RADIOLOGY ASSISTANCE.
(E) EACH MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE MUST BE A RESIDENT OF THE
STATE.
(F) (1) FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS, THE COMMITTEE SHALL ELECT A
CHAIR ONCE EVERY 2 YEARS.
(2) THE CHAIR, OR THE CHAIR’S DESIGNEE, SHALL SERVE IN AN
ADVISORY CAPACITY TO THE BOARD AS A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE COMMITTEE.
[(e)] (G) (1) The term of a member is 3 years.
(2) The terms of members are staggered as required by regulation.
(3) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies.
(4) A member may not serve more than [2] TWO consecutive full terms.
(5) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
(H) A QUORUM OF THE COMMITTEE CONSISTS OF FIVE MEMBERS.
14–5B–06.
– 43 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(a)] In addition to the powers set forth elsewhere in this subtitle, the Committee
shall:
(1) SHALL:
(1) (I) [Make recommendations] DEVELOP AND RECOMMEND to the
Board [on regulations necessary]:
(I) 1. REGULATIONS to carry out [the provisions of] this
subtitle; AND
(II) 2. ANY STATUTORY CHANGES THAT AFFECT THE
PROFESSION; AND
(2) (II) [Make recommendations to the Board on a code of ethics for the
practice of radiation therapy, the practice of radiography, the practice of nuclear medicine
technology, and the practice of radiology assistance for adoption by the Board;
(3) On request, make recommendations to the Board on standards of care
for the practice of radiation therapy, the practice of radiography, the practice of nuclear
medicine technology, and the practice of radiology assistance;
(4) Make recommendations to the Board on the requirements for licensure
as a radiation therapist, radiographer, nuclear medicine technologist, or radiologist
assistant;
(5) On request, review applications for licensure as a radiation therapist,
radiographer, nuclear medicine technologist, or radiologist assistant and make
recommendations to the Board;
(6) Develop and recommend to the Board continuing education
requirements for license renewal;
(7) Advise the Board on matters related to the practice of radiation
therapy, the practice of radiography, the practice of nuclear medicine technology, and the
practice of radiology assistance;
(8)] Keep a record of its [proceedings] MEETINGS; and
[(9) Submit an annual report to the Board.]
(3) ON REQUEST OF THE BOARD OR A DISCIPLINARY PANEL:
(2) MAY:
– 44 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(I) PROVIDE RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING THE PRACTICE
OF RADIATION THERAPY, RADIOGRAPHY, NUCLEAR MEDICINE TECHNOLOGY, AND
RADIOLOGY ASSISTANCE; AND
(II) ADVISE THE BOARD ON ANY OTHER MATTERS RELATED TO
RADIATION THERAPISTS, RADIOGRAPHERS, NUCLEAR MEDICINE TECHNOLOGISTS,
AND RADIOLOGIST ASSISTANTS.
[(b) The Board shall:
(1) Consider all recommendations of the Committee; and
(2) Provide to the Committee an annual report on the disciplinary matters
involving licensees.]
14–5B–08.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) [An individual] A RADIATION THERAPIST, RADIOGRAPHER,
NUCLEAR MEDICINE TECHNOLOGIST, OR RADIOLOGY ASSISTANT employed [by] IN
THE SERVICE OF the federal government [as a radiation therapist, radiographer, a nuclear
medicine technologist, or radiologist assistant] while [the individual is] practicing within
the scope of [that] THE employment; or
14–5B–11.
(a) Licensure as a radiation therapist authorizes an individual to practice
radiation therapy IN THE STATE while the license is effective.
(b) Licensure as a radiographer authorizes an individual to practice radiography
IN THE STATE while the license is effective.
(c) Licensure as a nuclear medicine technologist authorizes an individual to
practice nuclear medicine technology IN THE STATE while the license is effective.
(d) Licensure as a radiologist assistant authorizes an individual to practice
radiology assistance IN THE STATE while the license is effective.
14–5B–12.1.
(a) A licensee shall notify the Board in writing of a change in name or address
within [60] 10 30 days after the change.
– 45 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
14–5B–14.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of the quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(3) Is guilty of [unprofessional or immoral]:
(I) IMMORAL conduct in the practice of radiation therapy,
radiography, nuclear medicine technology, or radiology assistance; OR
(II) UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT IN THE PRACTICE OF
RADIATION THERAPY, RADIOGRAPHY, NUCLEAR MEDICINE TECHNOLOGY, OR
RADIOLOGY ASSISTANCE;
(4) Is [professionally, physically, or mentally]:
(I) PROFESSIONALLY INCOMPETENT;
(II) PHYSICALLY INCOMPETENT; OR
(III) MENTALLY incompetent;
(14) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY makes a misrepresentation while practicing
radiation therapy, radiography, nuclear medicine technology, or radiology assistance;
(15) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY practices radiation therapy, radiography,
nuclear medicine technology, or radiology assistance with an unauthorized individual or
aids an unauthorized individual in the practice of radiation therapy, radiography, nuclear
medicine technology, or radiology assistance;
(19) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY submits false statements to collect fees for
which services are not provided;
(21) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY fails to report suspected child abuse in
violation of § 5–704 of the Family Law Article;
14–5B–15.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (d) of this section, [hospitals,
related institutions, alternative health systems as defined in § 1–401 of this article, and
employers] EACH EMPLOYER OF A LICENSEE shall [file with] SUBMIT TO the Board a
report [that the hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or employer
limited, reduced, otherwise changed, or terminated any licensee for any reason] IF:
– 46 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(I) THE EMPLOYER:
1. REDUCED, SUSPENDED, REVOKED, RESTRICTED,
DENIED, CONDITIONED, OR DID NOT RENEW THE LICENSEE’S CLINICAL PRIVILEGES,
EMPLOYMENT, OR OTHER ABILITY TO PRACTICE OR TREAT PATIENTS;
2. INVOLUNTARILY TERMINATED OR RESTRICTED THE
LICENSEE’S EMPLOYMENT OR STAFF MEMBERSHIP; OR
3. ASKED THE LICENSEE TO VOLUNTARILY RESIGN
BECAUSE OF THE LICENSEE’S CONDUCT OR WHILE THE LICENSEE IS BEING
INVESTIGATED; AND
(II) THE ACTION DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH WAS TAKEN:
1. FOR REASONS that might be grounds for disciplinary
action under § 14–5B–14 of this subtitle;
2. BECAUSE THE LICENSEE MAY HAVE ENGAGED IN AN
ACT THAT MAY CONSTITUTE UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT;
3. BECAUSE THE LICENSEE MAY BE UNABLE TO
PRACTICE NUCLEAR MEDICINE TECHNOLOGY, RADIATION THERAPY,
RADIOGRAPHY, OR RADIOLOGY ASSISTANCE WITH REASONABLE SKILL AND SAFETY
BECAUSE OF A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL CONDITION OR PROFESSIONAL
INCOMPETENCE; OR
4. BECAUSE THE LICENSEE MAY HAVE HARMED OR
PLACED ONE OR MORE PATIENTS OR THE PUBLIC AT UNREASONABLE RISK OF HARM
BY ENGAGING IN AN ACT THAT CREATES AN IMMEDIATE OR CONTINUING DANGER.
(2) EACH REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE ACTION TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER;
(II) A DETAILED EXPLANATION OF THE REASONS FOR THE
ACTION, INCLUDING REFERENCES TO SPECIFIC PATIENT MEDICAL RECORDS, IF
ANY, THAT INFORMED THE EMPLOYER’S ACTION; AND
(III) THE STEPS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER TO INVESTIGATE THE
CONDUCT OF THE LICENSEE.
– 47 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) (I) THE BOARD MAY REQUEST FROM THE EMPLOYER
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REGARDING AN ACTION DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT WAS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER.
(II) IF AN EMPLOYER RECEIVES A REQUEST MADE UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE EMPLOYER SHALL PROMPTLY
PROVIDE THE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION.
(b) [A hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or] IF AN employer
[that has reason to know that] KNOWS THAT THE CONDUCT OF a licensee [has committed
an action or has a condition that might be grounds for reprimand or probation of the
licensee or suspension or revocation of the licensure] REQUIRES THAT THE EMPLOYER
SUBMIT A REPORT UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION because the licensee
is [alcohol impaired or drug] impaired BY ALCOHOL OR ANOTHER SUBSTANCE, THE
EMPLOYER is not required to report the licensee to the Board if:
(1) The [hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or]
employer knows that the licensee is:
(i) In [an alcohol or drug] A SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER treatment
program that is accredited by [the] THE Joint Commission [on Accreditation of Healthcare
Organizations] or is certified by the Department; or
(ii) Under the care of a health care practitioner who is competent
and capable of dealing with [alcoholism and drug abuse] SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS;
(2) (i) The [hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or]
employer is able to verify that the licensee remains in the treatment program until
SUCCESSFUL discharge; and
(ii) The action or condition of the licensee has not caused injury to
any person while the licensee is practicing AS A LICENSED NUCLEAR MEDICINE
TECHNOLOGIST, LICENSED RADIATION THERAPIST, LICENSED RADIOGRAPHER, OR
LICENSED RADIOLOGIST ASSISTANT.
(c) (1) If the licensee enters, or is considering entering, an alcohol or drug
treatment program that is accredited by [the] THE Joint Commission [on Accreditation of
Healthcare Organizations] or that is certified by the Department, the licensee shall notify
the hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or employer [of] WITHIN 15
DAYS AFTER the licensee’s decision to enter the treatment program.
[(2) If the licensee fails to provide the notice required under paragraph (1)
of this subsection, and the hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or
– 48 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
employer learns that the licensee has entered a treatment program, the hospital, related
institution, alternative health system, or employer shall report to the Board that the
licensee has entered a treatment program and has failed to provide the required notice.
(3) If the licensee is found to be noncompliant with the treatment
program’s policies and procedures while in the treatment program, the treatment program
shall notify the hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or employer of the
licensee’s noncompliance.
(4) On receipt of the notification required under paragraph (3) of this
subsection, the hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or] IF THE
EMPLOYER KNOWS THAT THE LICENSEE IS NONCOMPLIANT WITH THE SUBSTANCE
USE DISORDER TREATMENT PROGRAM, THE employer of the licensee shall report the
licensee’s noncompliance to the Board.
(d) (1) THE BOARD MAY EXTEND THE REPORTING UNDER THIS SECTION
FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN.
(2) A person is not required under this section to make any report that
would be in violation of any federal or State law, rule, or regulation concerning the
confidentiality of [alcohol and drug abuse] SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER patient records.
(E) THE BOARD MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION BY SUBPOENA.
(F) ANY PERSON SHALL HAVE THE IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY DESCRIBED
UNDER § 5–715(D) OF THE COURTS ARTICLE FOR GIVING ANY OF THE INFORMATION
REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION.
[(e)] (G) [The hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or] AN
employer REQUIRED TO MAKE A REPORT TO THE BOARD UNDER THIS SECTION shall
submit the report within 10 days [of any] AFTER THE action [described in this section]
REQUIRING THE REPORT.
[(f)] (H) A report made under this section is PRIVILEGED, NOT SUBJECT TO
INSPECTION UNDER THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT, AND not subject to subpoena or
discovery in any civil action other than a proceeding arising out of a hearing and decision
of the Board or a disciplinary panel under this title.
(g) (I) (1) A disciplinary panel may impose a civil penalty of up to [$1,000]
$5,000 for failure KNOWINGLY FAILING to report under this section.
(2) A DISCIPLINARY PANEL MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY OF UP TO
$5,000 PER INCIDENT FOR A REPORT MADE BY AN EMPLOYER IN BAD FAITH.
– 49 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) The Board shall remit any penalty collected under this subsection into
the General Fund of the State.
14–5B–18.1.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a licensed physician may not
employ or supervise an individual practicing radiation therapy, radiography, nuclear
medicine technology, or radiology assistance without a license.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a hospital, related institution,
alternative health system, or AN employer may not employ an individual practicing
radiation therapy, radiography, nuclear medicine technology, or radiology assistance
without a license.
(c) A disciplinary panel may impose a civil penalty of up to [$1,000] $5,000 for
employing an individual without a license under this section.
14–5B–19.
(a) A person who violates [any provision of §§ 14–5B–17 through 14–5B–18.1] §
14–5B–17 OR § 14–5B–18 of this subtitle is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is
subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 1 year or both.
(b) A person who violates [any provision of §§ 14–5B–17 through 14–5B–18.1] §
14–5B–17 OR § 14–5B–18 of this subtitle is subject to a civil fine of not more than $5,000
to be levied by a disciplinary panel.
(c) The Board shall pay any penalty collected under this section into the Board of
Physicians Fund.
14–5C–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Committee” means the Polysomnography [Professional Standards]
ADVISORY Committee established under § 14–5C–05 of this subtitle.
14–5C–05.
There is a Polysomnography [Professional Standards] ADVISORY Committee within
the Board.
14–5C–06.
(a) The Committee consists of seven members appointed by the Board as follows:
– 50 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(1) [(i) On or before September 30, 2009, three registered
polysomnographic technologists; or
(ii) On or after October 1, 2009, three] THREE licensed
polysomnographic technologists;
(2) Three LICENSED physicians who are board certified in sleep medicine:
(i) One of whom is a specialist in psychiatry or internal medicine;
(ii) One of whom is a specialist in pulmonary medicine; and
(iii) One of whom is a specialist in neurology; and
(3) One consumer member.
(B) EACH MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE LICENSED BY THE BOARD MUST BE
IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE BOARD.
[(b)] (C) The consumer member of the Committee:
(1) [Shall] MUST be a member of the general public;
(2) May not be or ever have been:
(i) A polysomnographic technologist;
(ii) Any OTHER health care professional; or
(iii) In training to be a polysomnographic technologist or other health
care professional; AND
(3) [May not have a household member who is a health care professional
or is in training to be a health care professional; and
(4)] May not:
(i) Participate or ever have participated in a commercial or
professional field related to polysomnography;
(ii) Have a household member who participates in a commercial or
professional field related to polysomnography;
(iii) Have had within 2 years before appointment a financial interest
in a person regulated by the Board; or
– 51 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iv) Have had within 2 years before appointment a financial interest
in the provision of goods or services to polysomnographic technologists or to the field of
polysomnography.
(D) EACH MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE MUST BE A RESIDENT OF THE
STATE.
[(c)] (E) (1) The term of a member is 3 years.
(2) The terms of members are staggered as required by [the terms provided
for members of the Committee on October 1, 2006] REGULATION.
(3) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies.
(4) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for the
rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(5) A MEMBER MAY NOT SERVE MORE THAN TWO CONSECUTIVE FULL
TERMS.
[(d)] (F) (1) From among its members, the Committee shall elect a chair once
every 2 years.
(2) The chair, or the chair’s designee, shall serve in an advisory capacity to
the Board as a representative of the Committee.
(G) A QUORUM OF THE COMMITTEE CONSISTS OF FOUR MEMBERS.
14–5C–07.
[(a)] In addition to the powers set forth elsewhere in this subtitle, the Committee
shall:
(1) SHALL:
(1) (I) Develop and recommend to the Board [regulations]:
(I) 1. REGULATIONS to carry out [the provisions of] this
subtitle; AND
(II) 2. ANY STATUTORY CHANGES THAT AFFECT THE
PROFESSION; AND
– 52 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(2) (II) [Develop and recommend to the Board a code of ethics for the
practice of polysomnography for adoption by the Board;
(3) Develop and recommend to the Board standards of care for the practice
of polysomnography;
(4) Develop and recommend to the Board the requirements for licensure as
a polysomnographic technologist, including:
(i) Criteria for the educational and clinical training of licensed
polysomnographic technologists; and
(ii) Criteria for a professional competency examination and testing
of applicants for a license to practice polysomnography;
(5) Develop and recommend to the Board criteria for licensed
polysomnographic technologists who are licensed in other states to practice in this State;
(6) Evaluate the accreditation status of education programs in
polysomnography for approval by the Board;
(7) Evaluate the credentials of applicants and recommend licensure of
applicants who fulfill the requirements for a license to practice polysomnography;
(8) Develop and recommend to the Board continuing education
requirements for license renewal;
(9) Provide the Board with recommendations concerning the practice of
polysomnography;
(10) Develop and recommend to the Board criteria for the direction of
students in clinical education programs by licensed polysomnographic technologists and
licensed physicians;
(11)] Keep a record of its [proceedings] MEETINGS; and
[(12) Submit an annual report to the Board.]
(3) ON REQUEST OF THE BOARD OR A DISCIPLINARY PANEL:
(2) MAY:
(I) PROVIDE RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING THE PRACTICE
OF POLYSOMNOGRAPHY; AND
– 53 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) ADVISE THE BOARD ON ANY OTHER MATTERS RELATED TO
POLYSOMNOGRAPHIC TECHNOLOGIST PRACTITIONERS.
[(b) The Board shall:
(1) Consider all recommendations of the Committee; and
(2) Provide to the Committee an annual report on the disciplinary matters
involving licensees.]
14–5C–08.
(b) This section does not apply to [a]:
(1) A student enrolled in an education program under § 14–5C–09(c)(3) of
this subtitle while practicing polysomnography in that program[.];
[(c)] (2) [This section does not apply to a] A respiratory care practitioner who
was licensed by the Board to practice respiratory care on or before December 31, 2012, and
whose duties include practicing polysomnography; OR
(3) A POLYSOMNOGRAPHIC TECHNOLOGIST EMPLOYED IN THE
SERVICE OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT WHILE PRACTICING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF
THE EMPLOYMENT.
[14–5C–10.
(a) The Board shall waive the education requirement under § 14–5C–09(c)(3) of
this subtitle if on or before September 30, 2013, an individual:
(1) Has passed the national certifying examination by the Board of
Registered Polysomnographic Technologists or another examination approved by the
Board;
(2) Is certified by the Board of Registered Polysomnographic Technologists
as a registered polysomnographic technologist;
(3) Has submitted an application for licensure to the Board; and
(4) Meets all of the requirements under § 14–5C–09(b) and (c)(1) and (2) of
this subtitle.
(b) (1) If an individual has not satisfied the requirements under subsection (a)
of this section on or before September 30, 2013, the individual may petition the Board for
an extension.
– 54 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(2) The Board shall determine whether to grant an extension under this
subsection on a case–by–case basis.]
14–5C–14.1.
(a) A licensee shall notify the Board in writing of a change in name or address
within [60] 10 30 days after the change.
14–5C–17.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(3) Is guilty of [unprofessional or immoral]:
(I) IMMORAL conduct in the practice of polysomnography; OR
(II) UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT IN THE PRACTICE OF
POLYSOMNOGRAPHY;
(4) Is [professionally, physically, or mentally]:
(I) PROFESSIONALLY INCOMPETENT;
(II) PHYSICALLY INCOMPETENT; OR
(III) MENTALLY incompetent;
(14) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY makes a misrepresentation while practicing
polysomnography;
(15) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY practices polysomnography with an
unauthorized individual or aids an unauthorized individual in the practice of
polysomnography;
(16) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY delegates a polysomnographic duty to an
unlicensed individual;
(20) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY submits false statements to collect fees for
which services are not provided;
– 55 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(22) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY fails to report suspected child abuse in
violation of § 5–704 of the Family Law Article;
14–5C–18.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (d) of this section, [hospitals,
related institutions, alternative health systems as defined in § 1–401 of this article, and
employers] EACH EMPLOYER OF A LICENSED POLYSOMNOGRAPHIC TECHNOLOGIST
shall [file with] SUBMIT TO the Board a report [that the hospital, related institution,
alternative health system, or employer limited, reduced, otherwise changed, or terminated
any licensed polysomnographic technologist for any reason] IF:
(I) THE EMPLOYER:
1. REDUCED, SUSPENDED, REVOKED, RESTRICTED,
DENIED, CONDITIONED, OR DID NOT RENEW THE LICENSED POLYSOMNOGRAPHIC
TECHNOLOGIST’S CLINICAL PRIVILEGES, EMPLOYMENT, OR OTHER ABILITY TO
PRACTICE OR TREAT PATIENTS;
2. INVOLUNTARILY TERMINATED OR RESTRICTED THE
LICENSED POLYSOMNOGRAPHIC TECHNOLOGIST’S EMPLOYMENT OR STAFF
MEMBERSHIP; OR
3. ASKED THE LICENSED POLYSOMNOGRAPHIC
TECHNOLOGIST TO VOLUNTARILY RESIGN BECAUSE OF THE LICENSED
POLYSOMNOGRAPHIC TECHNOLOGIST’S CONDUCT OR WHILE THE LICENSED
POLYSOMNOGRAPHIC TECHNOLOGIST IS BEING INVESTIGATED; AND
(II) THE ACTION DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH WAS TAKEN:
1. FOR REASONS that might be grounds for disciplinary
action under § 14–5C–17 of this subtitle;
2. BECAUSE THE LICENSED POLYSOMNOGRAPHIC
TECHNOLOGIST MAY HAVE ENGAGED IN AN ACT THAT MAY CONSTITUTE
UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT;
3. BECAUSE THE LICENSED POLYSOMNOGRAPHIC
TECHNOLOGIST MAY BE UNABLE TO PRACTICE POLYSOMNOGRAPHY WITH
REASONABLE SKILL AND SAFETY BECAUSE OF A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL CONDITION
OR PROFESSIONAL INCOMPETENCE; OR
– 56 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
4. BECAUSE THE LICENSED POLYSOMNOGRAPHIC
TECHNOLOGIST MAY HAVE HARMED OR PLACED ONE OR MORE PATIENTS OR THE
PUBLIC AT UNREASONABLE RISK OF HARM BY ENGAGING IN AN ACT THAT CREATES
AN IMMEDIATE OR CONTINUING DANGER.
(2) EACH REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE ACTION TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER;
(II) A DETAILED EXPLANATION OF THE REASONS FOR THE
ACTION, INCLUDING REFERENCES TO SPECIFIC PATIENT MEDICAL RECORDS, IF
ANY, THAT INFORMED THE EMPLOYER’S ACTION; AND
(III) THE STEPS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER TO INVESTIGATE THE
CONDUCT OF THE LICENSED POLYSOMNOGRAPHIC TECHNOLOGIST.
(3) (I) THE BOARD MAY REQUEST FROM THE EMPLOYER
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REGARDING AN ACTION DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT WAS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER.
(II) IF AN EMPLOYER RECEIVES A REQUEST MADE UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE EMPLOYER SHALL PROMPTLY
PROVIDE THE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION.
(b) [A hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or] IF AN employer
[that has reason to know] KNOWS that THE CONDUCT OF a licensed polysomnographic
technologist [has committed an action or has a condition that might be grounds for
reprimand or probation of the licensed polysomnographic technologist or suspension or
revocation of the license] REQUIRES THAT THE EMPLOYER SUBMIT A REPORT UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION because the licensed polysomnographic
technologist is [alcohol impaired or drug] impaired BY ALCOHOL OR ANOTHER
SUBSTANCE, THE EMPLOYER is not required to report the technologist to the Board if:
(1) The [hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or]
employer knows that the licensed polysomnographic technologist is:
(i) In [an alcohol or drug] A SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER treatment
program that is accredited by [the] THE Joint Commission [on Accreditation of Healthcare
Organizations] or is certified by the Department; or
(ii) Under the care of a health care practitioner who is competent
and capable of dealing with [alcoholism and drug abuse] SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS;
and
– 57 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) (i) The [hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or]
employer is able to verify that the licensed polysomnographic technologist remains in the
treatment program until SUCCESSFUL discharge; and
(ii) The action or condition of the licensed polysomnographic
technologist has not caused injury to any person while the LICENSED
POLYSOMNOGRAPHIC technologist is practicing as a licensed polysomnographic
technologist.
(c) (1) If the licensed polysomnographic technologist enters, or is considering
entering, an alcohol or drug treatment program that is accredited by [the] THE Joint
Commission [on Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations] or that is certified by the
Department, the licensed polysomnographic technologist shall notify the hospital, related
institution, alternative health system, or employer [of] WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER the
licensed polysomnographic technologist’s decision to enter the treatment program.
[(2) If the licensed polysomnographic technologist fails to provide the notice
required under paragraph (1) of this subsection, and the hospital, related institution,
alternative health system, or employer learns that the licensed polysomnographic
technologist has entered a treatment program, the hospital, related institution, alternative
health system, or employer shall report to the Board that the licensed polysomnographic
technologist has entered a treatment program and has failed to provide the required notice.
(3) If the licensed polysomnographic technologist is found to be
noncompliant with the treatment program’s policies and procedures while in the treatment
program, the treatment program shall notify the hospital, related institution, alternative
health system, or employer of the licensed polysomnographic technologist’s noncompliance.
(4) On receipt of the notification required under paragraph (3) of this
subsection, the hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or] IF THE
EMPLOYER KNOWS THAT THE LICENSED POLYSOMNOGRAPHIC TECHNOLOGIST IS
NONCOMPLIANT WITH THE SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT PROGRAM, THE
employer of the licensed polysomnographic technologist shall report the licensed
polysomnographic technologist’s noncompliance to the Board.
(d) (1) THE BOARD MAY EXTEND THE REPORTING UNDER THIS SECTION
FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN.
(2) A person is not required under this section to make any report that
would be in violation of any federal or State law, rule, or regulation concerning the
confidentiality of [alcohol and drug abuse] SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER patient records.
(E) THE BOARD MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION BY SUBPOENA.
– 58 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(F) ANY PERSON SHALL HAVE THE IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY DESCRIBED
UNDER § 5–715(D) OF THE COURTS ARTICLE FOR GIVING ANY OF THE INFORMATION
REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION.
[(e)] (G) [The hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or] AN
employer REQUIRED TO MAKE A REPORT TO THE BOARD UNDER THIS SECTION shall
submit the report within 10 days [of any] AFTER THE action [described in this section]
REQUIRING THE REPORT.
[(f)] (H) A report made under this section is PRIVILEGED, NOT SUBJECT TO
INSPECTION UNDER THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT, AND not subject to subpoena or
discovery in any civil action other than a proceeding arising out of a hearing and decision
of the Board or a disciplinary panel under this title.
(g) (I) (1) A disciplinary panel may impose a civil penalty of up to [$1,000] $5,000
for failure KNOWINGLY FAILING to report under this section.
(2) A DISCIPLINARY PANEL MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY OF UP TO
$5,000 PER INCIDENT FOR A REPORT MADE BY AN EMPLOYER IN BAD FAITH.
(3) The Board shall remit any penalty collected under this subsection into
the General Fund of the State.
14–5C–22.1.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, [a hospital, a related institution,
an alternative health system, or] an employer may not employ an individual practicing
polysomnography without a license.
14–5C–23.
(a) A person who violates [any provision of §§ 14–5C–20 through 14–5C–22.1] §
14–5C–20, § 14–5C–21, OR § 14–5C–22 of this subtitle is guilty of a misdemeanor and
on conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 1 year
or both.
(b) A person who violates [any provision of §§ 14–5C–20 through 14–5C–22.1] §
14–5C–20, § 14–5C–21, OR § 14–5C–22 of this subtitle is subject to a civil fine of not
more than $5,000 to be levied by a disciplinary panel.
(c) The Board shall pay any penalty collected under this section into the Board of
Physicians Fund.
14–5D–04.
– 59 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
There is an Athletic Trainer Advisory Committee within the Board.
14–5D–05.
(a) The Committee consists of [nine] SEVEN members appointed by the Board as
follows:
(1) Three licensed athletic trainers [who:
(i) Are certified by a national certifying board; and
(ii) Have a minimum of 5 years of clinical experience];
(2) Three licensed physicians:
(i) At least one of whom is a specialist in orthopedic or sports
medicine; and
(ii) Two of whom previously or currently have partnered with or
directed an athletic trainer; AND
[(3) One member who is:
(i) A licensed chiropractor who has sports medicine experience;
(ii) A licensed physical therapist; or
(iii) A licensed occupational therapist; and
(4)] (3) [Two] ONE consumer [members] MEMBER.
[(b) (1) The athletic trainer members may be appointed by the Board from a
list of qualified individuals submitted to the Board by the Maryland Athletic Trainers
Association, Inc.
(2) The Board may request an additional list of nominees for each vacancy.]
(B) THE BOARD SHALL APPOINT AT LEAST ONE OF THE ATHLETIC TRAINER
MEMBERS FROM A LIST OF NAMES SUBMITTED BY THE MARYLAND ATHLETIC
TRAINERS ASSOCIATION, INC.
(C) EACH MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE LICENSED BY THE BOARD MUST BE
IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE BOARD.
[(c)] (D) The consumer member of the Committee:
– 60 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(1) [Shall] MUST be a member of the general public;
(2) May not be or ever have been:
(i) An athletic trainer;
(ii) [A] ANY OTHER health care professional; or
(iii) In training to be an athletic trainer or other health professional;
and
(3) May not:
(i) Participate or ever have participated in a commercial or
professional field related to athletic training;
(ii) Have [had within 2 years before appointment a financial interest
in a person regulated by the Board] A HOUSEHOLD MEMBER WHO PARTICIPATES IN A
COMMERCIAL OR PROFESSIONAL FIELD RELATED TO ATHLETIC TRAINING; [or]
(iii) Have had within 2 years before appointment a financial interest
in the provision of goods or services to athletic trainers or to the field of athletic training;
OR
(IV) HAVE HAD WITHIN 2 YEARS BEFORE APPOINTMENT A
FINANCIAL INTEREST IN A PERSON REGULATED BY THE BOARD.
(E) EACH MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE MUST BE A RESIDENT OF THE
STATE.
[(d)] (F) (1) The term of a member is 3 years.
(2) The terms of members are staggered as required by [the terms provided
for members of the Committee on October 1, 2009] REGULATION.
(3) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed AND QUALIFIES.
(4) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for the
rest of the term and until a successor is appointed AND QUALIFIES.
(5) A MEMBER MAY NOT SERVE MORE THAN TWO CONSECUTIVE FULL
TERMS.
– 61 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(e)] (G) (1) From among its members, the Committee shall elect a chair
every 2 years.
(2) The chair shall serve in an advisory capacity to the Board as a
representative of the Committee.
(H) A QUORUM OF THE COMMITTEE CONSISTS OF FOUR MEMBERS.
14–5D–06.
[(a)] In addition to the powers set forth elsewhere in this subtitle, the Committee
shall:
(1) SHALL:
(1) (I) Develop and recommend to the Board [regulations]:
(I) 1. REGULATIONS to carry out this subtitle; AND
(II) 2. ANY STATUTORY CHANGES THAT AFFECT THE
PROFESSION; AND
(2) (II) [Develop and recommend to the Board continuing education
requirements for license renewal;
(3) Provide the Board with recommendations concerning the practice of
athletic training;
(4) Develop and recommend to the Board an evaluation and treatment
protocol for use by an athletic trainer and the physician with whom the athletic trainer
practices;
(5) Recommend to the Board approval, modification, or disapproval of
individual evaluation and treatment protocols;
(6)] Keep a record of its [proceedings] MEETINGS; and
[(7) Submit an annual report to the Board.]
(3) ON REQUEST OF THE BOARD OR A DISCIPLINARY PANEL:
(2) MAY:
(I) PROVIDE RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING THE PRACTICE
OF ATHLETIC TRAINING; AND
– 62 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(II) ADVISE THE BOARD ON ANY OTHER MATTERS RELATED TO
ATHLETIC TRAINERS.
[(b) The Board shall:
(1) Consider all recommendations of the Committee; and
(2) Provide to the Committee an annual report on the disciplinary matters
involving licensees.]
14–5D–07.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) An [individual] ATHLETIC TRAINER employed [by] IN THE SERVICE
OF the federal government [as an athletic trainer] while [the individual is] practicing
within the scope of [that] THE employment;
14–5D–10.
(a) An athletic trainer license authorizes the licensee to practice athletic training
services IN THE STATE while the license is effective.
14–5D–11.1.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, [a hospital, an institution, an
alternative health system, or any other] AN employer may not employ an individual
practicing athletic training without a license or without an approved evaluation and
treatment protocol.
(c) A disciplinary panel may impose a civil penalty of up to [$1,000] $5,000 on a
person who employs or supervises an individual without a license or without an approved
evaluation and treatment protocol.
14–5D–11.5.
(A) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (D) OF THIS
SECTION, EACH HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM,
AND EACH EMPLOYER OF A LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER SHALL FILE WITH SUBMIT
TO THE BOARD A REPORT THAT THE HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION,
ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER LIMITED, REDUCED, OTHERWISE
CHANGED, OR TERMINATED ANY LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER FOR ANY REASON IF:
(I) THE EMPLOYER:
– 63 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. REDUCED, SUSPENDED, REVOKED, RESTRICTED,
DENIED, CONDITIONED, OR DID NOT RENEW THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER’S
CLINICAL PRIVILEGES, EMPLOYMENT, OR OTHER ABILITY TO PRACTICE OR TREAT
PATIENTS;
2. INVOLUNTARILY TERMINATED OR RESTRICTED THE
LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER’S EMPLOYMENT OR STAFF MEMBERSHIP; OR
3. ASKED THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER TO
VOLUNTARILY RESIGN BECAUSE OF THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER’S CONDUCT
OR WHILE THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER IS BEING INVESTIGATED; AND
(II) THE ACTION DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH WAS TAKEN:
1. FOR REASONS THAT MIGHT BE GROUNDS FOR
DISCIPLINARY ACTION UNDER § 14–5D–14 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
2. BECAUSE THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER MAY
HAVE ENGAGED IN AN ACT THAT MAY CONSTITUTE UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT;
3. BECAUSE THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER MAY BE
UNABLE TO PRACTICE ATHLETIC TRAINING WITH REASONABLE SKILL AND SAFETY
BECAUSE OF A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL CONDITION OR PROFESSIONAL
INCOMPETENCE; OR
4. BECAUSE THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER MAY
HAVE HARMED OR PLACED ONE OR MORE PATIENTS OR THE PUBLIC AT
UNREASONABLE RISK OF HARM BY ENGAGING IN AN ACT THAT CREATES AN
IMMEDIATE OR CONTINUING DANGER.
(2) A REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE ACTION TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER;
(II) A DETAILED EXPLANATION OF THE REASONS FOR THE
ACTION, INCLUDING REFERENCES TO SPECIFIC PATIENT MEDICAL RECORDS, IF
ANY, THAT INFORMED THE EMPLOYER’S ACTION; AND
(III) THE STEPS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER TO INVESTIGATE THE
CONDUCT OF THE LICENSEE.
– 64 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(3) (I) THE BOARD MAY REQUEST FROM THE EMPLOYER
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REGARDING AN ACTION DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT WAS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER.
(II) IF AN EMPLOYER RECEIVES A REQUEST MADE UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE EMPLOYER SHALL PROMPTLY
PROVIDE THE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION.
(B) A HOSPITAL, A RELATED INSTITUTION, AN ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR IF AN EMPLOYER THAT HAS REASON TO KNOW THAT KNOWS THAT THE
CONDUCT OF A LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER HAS COMMITTED AN ACTION OR HAS
A CONDITION THAT MIGHT BE GROUNDS FOR REPRIMAND OR PROBATION OF THE
LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER OR SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF THE LICENSE
REQUIRES THAT THE EMPLOYER SUBMIT A REPORT UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF
THIS SECTION BECAUSE THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER IS ALCOHOL–IMPAIRED
OR DRUG–IMPAIRED IMPAIRED BY ALCOHOL OR ANOTHER SUBSTANCE, THE
EMPLOYER IS NOT REQUIRED TO REPORT THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER TO THE
BOARD IF:
(1) THE HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER KNOWS THAT THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER IS:
(I) IN AN ALCOHOL OR DRUG SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER
TREATMENT PROGRAM THAT IS ACCREDITED BY THE JOINT COMMISSION OR IS
CERTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT; OR
(II) UNDER THE CARE OF A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER WHO
IS COMPETENT AND CAPABLE OF DEALING WITH ALCOHOLISM AND DRUG ABUSE
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS;
(2) THE HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER IS ABLE TO VERIFY THAT THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER
REMAINS IN THE TREATMENT PROGRAM UNTIL SUCCESSFUL DISCHARGE; AND
(3) THE ACTION OR CONDITION OF THE LICENSED ATHLETIC
TRAINER HAS NOT CAUSED INJURY TO ANY PERSON WHILE THE PRACTITIONER
LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER IS PRACTICING AS A LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER.
(C) (1) IF THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER ENTERS OR IS
CONSIDERING ENTERING AN ALCOHOL OR DRUG TREATMENT PROGRAM THAT IS
ACCREDITED BY THE JOINT COMMISSION OR THAT IS CERTIFIED BY THE
DEPARTMENT, THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER SHALL NOTIFY THE HOSPITAL,
RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER WITHIN 15
– 65 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
DAYS AFTER THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER’S DECISION TO ENTER THE
TREATMENT PROGRAM.
(2) IF THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER FAILS TO PROVIDE THE
NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AND THE
HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER
LEARNS THAT THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER HAS ENTERED A TREATMENT
PROGRAM, THE HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM,
OR EMPLOYER SHALL REPORT TO THE BOARD THAT THE LICENSED ATHLETIC
TRAINER HAS ENTERED A TREATMENT PROGRAM AND HAS FAILED TO PROVIDE THE
REQUIRED NOTICE.
(3) IF THE TREATMENT PROGRAM FINDS THAT THE LICENSED
ATHLETIC TRAINER IS NONCOMPLIANT WITH THE TREATMENT PROGRAM’S
POLICIES AND PROCEDURES WHILE IN THE TREATMENT PROGRAM, THE TREATMENT
PROGRAM SHALL NOTIFY THE HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE
HEALTH SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER OF THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER’S
NONCOMPLIANCE.
(4) ON RECEIPT OF A NOTIFICATION MADE UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR IF THE EMPLOYER KNOWS THAT THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER IS
NONCOMPLIANT WITH THE SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT PROGRAM, THE
EMPLOYER OF THE LICENSED ATHLETIC TRAINER SHALL REPORT THE LICENSED
ATHLETIC TRAINER’S NONCOMPLIANCE TO THE BOARD.
(D) (1) THE BOARD MAY EXTEND THE REPORTING UNDER THIS SECTION
FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN.
(D) (2) A PERSON IS NOT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION TO MAKE ANY
REPORT THAT WOULD BE IN VIOLATION OF ANY FEDERAL OR STATE LAW, RULE, OR
REGULATION CONCERNING THE CONFIDENTIALITY OF ALCOHOL AND DRUG ABUSE
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER PATIENT RECORDS.
(E) THE BOARD MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION BY SUBPOENA.
(F) ANY PERSON SHALL HAVE THE IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY DESCRIBED
UNDER § 5–715(D) OF THE COURTS ARTICLE FOR GIVING ANY OF THE INFORMATION
REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION.
(E) (G) A HOSPITAL, A RELATED INSTITUTION, AN ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR AN AN EMPLOYER REQUIRED TO MAKE A REPORT TO THE BOARD UNDER
– 66 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
THIS SECTION SHALL SUBMIT THE REPORT WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE ACTION
REQUIRING THE REPORT.
(F) (H) A REPORT MADE UNDER THIS SECTION IS PRIVILEGED, NOT
SUBJECT TO INSPECTION UNDER THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT, AND NOT
SUBJECT TO SUBPOENA OR DISCOVERY IN ANY CIVIL ACTION OTHER THAN A
PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF A HEARING AND DECISION OF THE BOARD OR A
DISCIPLINARY PANEL UNDER THIS TITLE.
(G) (I) (1) A DISCIPLINARY PANEL MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY OF
UP TO $5,000 FOR FAILURE KNOWINGLY FAILING TO REPORT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) A DISCIPLINARY PANEL MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY OF UP TO
$5,000 PER INCIDENT FOR A REPORT MADE BY AN EMPLOYER IN BAD FAITH.
(3) THE BOARD SHALL REMIT ANY PENALTY COLLECTED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION INTO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
14–5D–12.1.
(a) A licensee shall notify the Board in writing of a change in name or address
within [60] 10 30 days after the change.
14–5D–14.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(3) Is guilty of [unprofessional or immoral]:
(I) IMMORAL conduct in the practice of athletic training; OR
(II) UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT IN THE PRACTICE OF
ATHLETIC TRAINING;
(4) Is [professionally, physically, or mentally]:
(I) PROFESSIONALLY INCOMPETENT;
(II) PHYSICALLY INCOMPETENT; OR
(III) MENTALLY incompetent;
– 67 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(14) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY makes a misrepresentation while practicing
athletic training;
(15) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY practices athletic training with an
unauthorized individual or aids an unauthorized individual in the practice of athletic
trainer services;
(19) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY submits false statements to collect fees for
which services have not been provided;
(21) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY fails to report suspected child abuse in
violation of § 5–704 of the Family Law Article;
14–5E–05.
There is a Perfusion Advisory Committee within the Board.
14–5E–06.
(a) The Committee consists of seven members, appointed by the Board as follows:
(1) [(i) On or before September 30, 2013, three individuals who practice
perfusion and who:
1. Are certified by a national certifying board; and
2. Have a minimum of 2 years experience; and
(ii) On or after October 1, 2013, three] THREE licensed
perfusionists;
(2) Three LICENSED physicians, at least one of whom performs cardiac or
cardio–thoracic surgery or is a cardiac anesthesiologist; and
(3) One consumer member.
(B) EACH MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE LICENSED BY THE BOARD MUST BE
IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE BOARD.
[(b)] (C) The consumer member of the Committee:
(1) [Shall] MUST be a member of the general public;
(2) May not [practice or ever have practiced perfusion or any health care
profession;
– 68 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(3) May not be or ever have been in training to practice perfusion or any
other health care profession;
(4) May not have a household member who is a health care professional or
is in training to be a health care professional] BE OR EVER HAVE BEEN:
(I) A PERFUSIONIST;
(II) ANY OTHER HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL; OR
(III) IN TRAINING TO BE A PERFUSIONIST OR OTHER HEALTH
PROFESSIONAL; and
[(5)] (3) May not:
(i) Participate or ever have participated in a commercial or
professional field related to perfusion;
(ii) Have a household member who participates in a commercial or
professional field related to perfusion;
(iii) Have had within 2 years before appointment a financial interest
in a person regulated by the Board; or
(iv) Have had within 2 years before appointment a financial interest
in the provision of goods or services to perfusionists or to the field of perfusion.
(D) EACH MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE MUST BE A RESIDENT OF THE
STATE.
[(c)] (E) (1) The term of a member is 3 years.
(2) The terms of members are staggered as required by [the terms provided
for members of the Committee on October 1, 2012] REGULATION.
(3) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies.
(4) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for the
rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(5) A MEMBER MAY NOT SERVE MORE THAN TWO CONSECUTIVE FULL
TERMS.
– 69 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(d)] (F) (1) From among its members, the Committee shall elect a chair
every 2 years.
(2) The chair shall serve in an advisory capacity to the Board as a
representative of the Committee.
(G) A QUORUM OF THE COMMITTEE CONSISTS OF FOUR MEMBERS.
14–5E–07.
[(a)] In addition to the powers set forth elsewhere in this subtitle, the Committee
shall:
(1) SHALL:
(1) (I) Develop and recommend to the Board:
(i) 1. Regulations to carry out [the provisions of] this subtitle;
AND
(ii) 2. [A code of ethics for the practice of perfusion for adoption
by the Board;
(iii) Recommendations concerning the practice of perfusion, including
standards of care for the practice of perfusion; and
(iv) Continuing education requirements for license renewal] ANY
STATUTORY CHANGES THAT AFFECT THE PROFESSION; AND
(2) (II) Keep a record of its [proceedings] MEETINGS; and
(3) [Submit an annual report to the Board] ON REQUEST OF THE BOARD
OR A DISCIPLINARY PANEL OF THE BOARD:
(2) MAY:
(I) PROVIDE RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING THE PRACTICE
OF PERFUSION; AND
(II) ADVISE THE BOARD ON ANY OTHER MATTERS RELATED TO
PERFUSIONISTS.
[(b) The Board shall:
– 70 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(1) Consider all recommendations of the Committee; and
(2) Provide to the Committee an annual report on the disciplinary matters
involving licensees.]
14–5E–08.
(b) This section does not apply to [a]:
(1) A student enrolled in an education program under § 14–5E–09(c)(2) of
this subtitle while practicing perfusion in that program; OR
(2) A PERFUSIONIST EMPLOYED IN THE SERVICE OF THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT WHILE PRACTICING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THE EMPLOYMENT.
14–5E–14.
(a) (1) A [licensed perfusionist] LICENSEE shall notify the Board in writing of
a change in name or address within [60] 10 30 days after the change.
14–5E–16.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of the quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(3) Is guilty of [unprofessional or immoral]:
(I) IMMORAL conduct in the practice of perfusion; OR
(II) UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT IN THE PRACTICE OF
PERFUSION;
(4) Is [professionally, physically, or mentally]:
(I) PROFESSIONALLY INCOMPETENT;
(II) PHYSICALLY INCOMPETENT; OR
(III) MENTALLY incompetent;
(14) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY makes a misrepresentation while practicing
perfusion;
– 71 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(15) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY practices perfusion with an unauthorized
individual or aids an unauthorized individual in the practice of perfusion;
(16) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY delegates a perfusion duty to an unlicensed
individual;
(20) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY submits false statements to collect fees for
which services are not provided;
(22) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY fails to report suspected child abuse in
violation of § 5–704 of the Family Law Article;
14–5E–18.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (d) of this section, [hospitals,
related institutions, alternative health systems as defined in § 1–401 of this article, and
employers] EACH EMPLOYER OF A LICENSED PERFUSIONIST shall [file with] SUBMIT
TO the Board a report [that the hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or
employer limited, reduced, otherwise changed, or terminated any licensed perfusionist for
any reason] IF:
(I) THE EMPLOYER:
1. REDUCED, SUSPENDED, REVOKED, RESTRICTED,
DENIED, CONDITIONED, OR DID NOT RENEW THE LICENSED PERFUSIONIST’S
CLINICAL PRIVILEGES, EMPLOYMENT, OR OTHER ABILITY TO PRACTICE OR TREAT
PATIENTS;
2. INVOLUNTARILY TERMINATED OR RESTRICTED THE
LICENSEE’S EMPLOYMENT OR STAFF MEMBERSHIP; OR
3. ASKED THE LICENSEE TO VOLUNTARILY RESIGN
BECAUSE OF THE LICENSED PERFUSIONIST’S CONDUCT OR WHILE THE LICENSEE IS
BEING INVESTIGATED; AND
(II) THE ACTION DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH WAS TAKEN:
1. FOR REASONS that might be grounds for disciplinary
action under § 14–5E–16 of this subtitle;
2. BECAUSE THE LICENSED PERFUSIONIST MAY HAVE
ENGAGED IN AN ACT THAT MAY CONSTITUTE UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT;
– 72 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
3. BECAUSE THE LICENSED PERFUSIONIST MAY BE
UNABLE TO PRACTICE PERFUSION WITH REASONABLE SKILL AND SAFETY BECAUSE
OF A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL CONDITION OR PROFESSIONAL INCOMPETENCE; OR
4. BECAUSE THE LICENSED PERFUSIONIST MAY HAVE
HARMED OR PLACED ONE OR MORE PATIENTS OR THE PUBLIC AT UNREASONABLE
RISK OF HARM BY ENGAGING IN AN ACT THAT CREATES AN IMMEDIATE OR
CONTINUING DANGER.
(2) A REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE ACTION TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER;
(II) A DETAILED EXPLANATION OF THE REASONS FOR THE
ACTION, INCLUDING REFERENCES TO SPECIFIC PATIENT MEDICAL RECORDS, IF
ANY, THAT INFORMED THE EMPLOYER’S ACTION; AND
(III) THE STEPS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER TO INVESTIGATE THE
CONDUCT OF THE LICENSED PERFUSIONIST.
(3) (I) THE BOARD MAY REQUEST FROM THE EMPLOYER
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REGARDING AN ACTION DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT WAS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER.
(II) IF AN EMPLOYER RECEIVES A REQUEST MADE UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE EMPLOYER SHALL PROMPTLY
PROVIDE THE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION.
(b) [A hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or] IF AN employer
[that has reason to know that] KNOWS THAT THE CONDUCT OF a licensed perfusionist
[has committed an act or has a condition that might be grounds for reprimand or probation
of the licensed perfusionist or suspension or revocation of the license] REQUIRES THAT
THE EMPLOYER SUBMIT A REPORT UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION
because the licensed perfusionist is [alcohol–impaired or drug–impaired] IMPAIRED BY
ALCOHOL OR ANOTHER SUBSTANCE, THE EMPLOYER is not required to report the
licensed perfusionist to the Board if:
(1) The [hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or]
employer knows that the licensed perfusionist is:
(i) In [an alcohol or drug] A SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER treatment
program that is accredited by [the] THE Joint Commission [or its successor], or is certified
by the Department; or
– 73 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) Under the care of a health care practitioner who is competent
and capable of dealing with [alcoholism and drug abuse] SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS;
and
(2) (i) The [hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or]
employer is able to verify that the licensed perfusionist remains in the treatment program
until SUCCESSFUL discharge; and
(ii) The action or condition of the licensed perfusionist has not
caused injury to any person while the perfusionist is practicing as a licensed perfusionist.
(c) (1) If the licensed perfusionist enters, or is considering entering, an alcohol
or drug treatment program that is accredited by [the] THE Joint Commission [on
Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations] or that is certified by the Department, the
licensed perfusionist shall notify the hospital, related institution, alternative health
system, or employer [of] WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER the licensed perfusionist’s decision to
enter the treatment program.
[(2) If the licensed perfusionist fails to provide the notice required under
paragraph (1) of this subsection, and the hospital, related institution, alternative health
system, or employer learns that the licensed perfusionist has entered a treatment program,
the hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or employer shall report to the
Board that the licensed perfusionist has entered a treatment program and has failed to
provide the required notice.
(3) If the licensed perfusionist is found to be noncompliant with the
treatment program’s policies and procedures while in the treatment program, the
treatment program shall notify the hospital, related institution, alternative health system,
or employer of the licensed perfusionist’s noncompliance.
(4) On receipt of the notification required under paragraph (3) of this
subsection, the hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or] IF THE
EMPLOYER KNOWS THAT THE LICENSED PERFUSIONIST IS NONCOMPLIANT WITH
THE SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER PROGRAM, THE employer of the licensed perfusionist
shall report the licensed perfusionist’s noncompliance to the Board.
(d) (1) THE BOARD MAY EXTEND THE REPORTING UNDER THIS SECTION
FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN.
(2) A person is not required under this section to make any report that
would be in violation of any federal or State law, rule, or regulation concerning the
confidentiality of [alcohol– and drug abuse–related] SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER patient
records.
– 74 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(E) THE BOARD MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION BY SUBPOENA.
(F) ANY PERSON SHALL HAVE THE IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY DESCRIBED
UNDER § 5–715(D) OF THE COURTS ARTICLE FOR GIVING ANY OF THE INFORMATION
REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION.
[(e)] (G) [The hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or] AN
employer REQUIRED TO MAKE A REPORT TO THE BOARD UNDER THIS SECTION shall
submit the report within 10 days [of any] AFTER THE action [described in this section]
REQUIRING THE REPORT.
[(f)] (H) A report made under this section is PRIVILEGED, NOT SUBJECT TO
INSPECTION UNDER THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT, AND not subject to subpoena or
discovery in any civil action other than a proceeding arising out of a hearing and decision
of the Board or a disciplinary panel under this title.
(g) (I) (1) A disciplinary panel may impose a civil penalty of up to [$1,000] $5,000
for failure KNOWINGLY FAILING to report under this section.
(2) A DISCIPLINARY PANEL MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY OF UP TO
$5,000 PER INCIDENT FOR A REPORT MADE BY AN EMPLOYER IN BAD FAITH.
(3) The Board shall remit any penalty collected under this subsection into
the General Fund of the State.
14–5E–22.1.
(A) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE, A LICENSED
PHYSICIAN MAY NOT EMPLOY OR SUPERVISE AN INDIVIDUAL PRACTICING
PERFUSION WITHOUT A LICENSE.
(B) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE, A HOSPITAL, A
RELATED INSTITUTION, AN ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM, OR AN EMPLOYER MAY
NOT EMPLOY AN INDIVIDUAL TO PRACTICE PERFUSION WITHOUT A LICENSE.
(C) A DISCIPLINARY PANEL MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY OF UP TO $5,000
FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(D) THE BOARD SHALL REMIT ANY PENALTY COLLECTED UNDER THIS
SECTION INTO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
14–5F–06.
There is a Naturopathic Medicine Advisory Committee within the Board.
– 75 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
14–5F–07.
(a) (1) The Committee consists of five members appointed by the Board as
follows:
(i) Two shall be [individuals who practice naturopathic medicine
and who:
1. On or after October 1, 2014:
A. Are certified by the North American Board of
Naturopathic Examiners; and
B. Have a minimum of 2 years experience; and
2. On or after March 1, 2016, are] licensed naturopathic
doctors;
(ii) One shall be a [practicing] licensed physician;
(iii) One shall be a [practicing] licensed physician with experience
working with naturopathic doctors; and
(iv) One shall be a consumer member.
(2) The Board shall appoint the naturopathic doctor members from a list of
names submitted by the Maryland Association of Naturopathic Physicians.
(b) Each [naturopathic doctor member of the Committee shall be:
(1) In] MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE LICENSED BY THE BOARD MUST
BE IN good standing with the Board[; and
(2) A resident of the State who has been engaged actively in the practice or
instruction of naturopathic medicine for at least 5 years immediately before appointment].
[(c) The physician members of the Committee shall be in good standing with the
Board.]
[(d)] (C) The consumer member of the Committee:
(1) [Shall] MUST be a [resident of the State and a] member of the general
public;
– 76 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(2) May not be or ever have been [licensed to practice a health occupation
under this article]:
(I) A LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR;
(II) ANY OTHER HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL; OR
(III) IN TRAINING TO BE A NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR OR OTHER
HEALTH PROFESSIONAL; and
(3) May not [have a substantial personal, business, professional, or
pecuniary connection with naturopathic education, business, or practice.]:
(I) PARTICIPATE OR EVER HAVE PARTICIPATED IN A
COMMERCIAL OR PROFESSIONAL FIELD RELATED TO NATUROPATHIC MEDICINE;
(II) HAVE A HOUSEHOLD MEMBER WHO PARTICIPATES IN A
COMMERCIAL OR PROFESSIONAL FIELD RELATED TO NATUROPATHIC MEDICINE;
(III) HAVE HAD WITHIN 2 YEARS BEFORE APPOINTMENT A
FINANCIAL INTEREST IN A PERSON REGULATED BY THE BOARD; OR
(IV) HAVE HAD WITHIN 2 YEARS BEFORE APPOINTMENT A
FINANCIAL INTEREST IN THE PROVISION OF GOODS OR SERVICES TO
NATUROPATHIC DOCTORS OR TO THE FIELD OF NATUROPATHIC MEDICINE.
(D) EACH MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE MUST BE A RESIDENT OF THE
STATE.
(e) (1) The term of a member is [4] 3 years.
(2) The terms of members are staggered as required by [the terms provided
for members of the Committee on October 1, 2014] REGULATION.
(3) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies.
(4) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
[(4)] (5) A member may not serve more than two consecutive full terms.
(f) From among its members, the Committee shall elect a chair every 2 years.
– 77 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(G) A QUORUM OF THE COMMITTEE CONSISTS OF THREE MEMBERS.
14–5F–08.
In addition to the powers set forth elsewhere in this subtitle, the Committee shall:
(1) SHALL:
(1) (I) Develop and recommend to the Board [regulations]:
(I) 1. REGULATIONS to carry out this subtitle; AND
(II) 2. ANY STATUTORY CHANGES THAT AFFECT THE
PROFESSION; AND
(2) (II) [Develop and recommend to the Board procedures for the
issuance of licenses to applicants who qualify for licensure by reciprocity;
(3) Evaluate the content of any clinical, practical, or residency requirement
for licensure;
(4) Provide any service and perform any function that is necessary to fulfill
its purposes;
(5) Develop and recommend to the Board examination standards,
consistent with the standards enumerated in this subtitle, for licensure and times at which
the examinations will be given;
(6) Develop and recommend to the Board a code of ethics for licensed
naturopathic doctors; and
(7) Develop and recommend to the Board continuing education
requirements for license renewal] KEEP A RECORD OF ITS MEETINGS; AND
(3) ON REQUEST OF THE BOARD OR A DISCIPLINARY PANEL OF THE
BOARD:
(2) MAY:
(I) PROVIDE RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING THE PRACTICE
OF NATUROPATHIC MEDICINE; AND
(II) ADVISE THE BOARD ON ANY OTHER MATTERS RELATED TO
NATUROPATHIC DOCTORS.
– 78 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
14–5F–10.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) [An individual] A NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR who is employed [by the
United States] IN THE SERVICE OF THE FEDERAL government [to practice naturopathic
medicine] while practicing within the scope of [that] THE employment;
14–5F–12.
To apply for a license, an applicant shall:
(1) Complete a criminal history records check in accordance with §
14–308.1 of this title;
(2) Submit an application to the Board on a form that the Board requires;
(3) Pay to the Board an application fee set by the Board; AND
(4) If the applicant has been licensed, certified, or registered to practice
naturopathic medicine in another state, submit all evidence relating to:
(i) Any disciplinary action taken or any administrative penalties
assessed against the applicant by the appropriate state licensing, certification, or
registration authority; and
(ii) Any consent agreements the applicant entered into that contain
conditions placed on the applicant’s professional conduct and practice, including any
voluntary surrender of a license[;
(5) Complete and submit to the Board a Board–approved written
attestation that:
(i) States that the applicant has a collaboration and consultation
agreement with a physician licensed under this article;
(ii) Includes the name and license number of the physician with
whom the applicant has a collaboration and consultation agreement;
(iii) States that the applicant will refer patients to and consult with
physicians and other health care providers licensed or certified under this article as needed;
and
– 79 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iv) States that the applicant will require patients to sign a consent
form that states that the applicant’s practice of naturopathic medicine is limited to the
scope of practice identified in § 14–5F–14 of this subtitle; and
(6) Inform the physician named in the attestation that the physician has
been named].
14–5F–12.1.
(A) TO PRACTICE NATUROPATHIC MEDICINE IN THE STATE, A
NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR SHALL MAINTAIN AT ALL TIMES A COLLABORATION AND
CONSULTATION AGREEMENT WITH A PHYSICIAN LICENSED IN THE STATE.
(B) BEFORE AN INDIVIDUAL MAY PRACTICE NATUROPATHIC MEDICINE IN
THE STATE, THE INDIVIDUAL SHALL:
(1) OBTAIN A LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) ENTER INTO A COLLABORATION AND CONSULTATION
AGREEMENT WITH A PHYSICIAN LICENSED IN THE STATE; AND
(3) ATTEST TO THE COMPLETION OF THE COLLABORATION AND
CONSULTATION AGREEMENT ON A FORM PROVIDED BY THE BOARD.
(C) A COLLABORATION AND CONSULTATION AGREEMENT SHALL:
(1) STATE THAT THE APPLICANT HAS A COLLABORATION AND
CONSULTATION AGREEMENT WITH A PHYSICIAN LICENSED IN THE STATE;
(2) INCLUDE THE NAME AND LICENSE NUMBER OF THE PHYSICIAN
WITH WHOM THE APPLICANT HAS A COLLABORATION AND CONSULTATION
AGREEMENT;
(3) STATE THAT THE APPLICANT WILL REFER PATIENTS TO AND
CONSULT WITH PHYSICIANS AND OTHER HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS LICENSED OR
CERTIFIED UNDER THIS ARTICLE AS NEEDED; AND
(4) STATES THAT THE APPLICANT WILL REQUIRE PATIENTS TO SIGN
A CONSENT FORM THAT STATES THAT THE APPLICANT’S PRACTICE OF
NATUROPATHIC MEDICINE IS LIMITED TO THE SCOPE OF PRACTICE ESTABLISHED IN
§ 14–5F–14 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
– 80 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(D) A NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR SHALL INFORM THE PHYSICIAN NAMED IN
THE COLLABORATION AND CONSULTATION AGREEMENT THAT THE PHYSICIAN HAS
BEEN NAMED.
(E) SUBJECT TO THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER § 14–5F–12.2 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, A NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR AND A LICENSED PHYSICIAN MAY TERMINATE
A COLLABORATION AND CONSULTATION AGREEMENT AT ANY TIME.
(F) IN THE EVENT OF THE SUDDEN DEPARTURE, INCAPACITY, OR DEATH OF
THE NAMED LICENSED PHYSICIAN OR CHANGE IN LICENSE STATUS THAT RESULTS
IN THE NAMED LICENSED PHYSICIAN BEING UNABLE TO PRACTICE MEDICINE, THE
NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR MAY NOT PRACTICE IN THE STATE UNTIL THE
NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR ENTERS INTO A NEW COLLABORATION AND CONSULTATION
AGREEMENT.
(G) A NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR WHOSE COLLABORATION AND
CONSULTATION AGREEMENT IS TERMINATED MAY NOT PRACTICE NATUROPATHIC
MEDICINE IN THE STATE.
14–5F–12.2.
(A) A PHYSICIAN OR AN EMPLOYER SHALL NOTIFY THE BOARD WITHIN 10
DAYS AFTER THE TERMINATION OF A NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR FOR REASONS THAT
WOULD BE GROUNDS FOR DISCIPLINE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A PHYSICIAN NAMED IN A COLLABORATION AND CONSULTATION
AGREEMENT WITH A NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR AND A NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR
SHALL NOTIFY THE BOARD WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE TERMINATION OF A
COLLABORATION AND CONSULTATION AGREEMENT.
14–5F–15.1.
(a) A licensee shall notify the Board in writing of a change in name or address
within [60] 10 30 days after the change.
14–5F–18.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license of any licensee if the applicant or licensee:
(2) [Has been found to be mentally] IS:
– 81 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) PROFESSIONALLY incompetent [by a physician if the mental
incompetence impairs the ability of the applicant or licensee to undertake the practice of
naturopathic medicine in a manner consistent with the safety of the public];
(II) PHYSICALLY INCOMPETENT; OR
(III) MENTALLY INCOMPETENT;
(19) Is guilty of [unprofessional or immoral]:
(I) IMMORAL conduct in the practice of naturopathic medicine; OR
(II) UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT IN THE PRACTICE OF
NATUROPATHIC MEDICINE;
(21) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY fails to report suspected child abuse in
violation of § 5–704 of the Family Law Article;
14–5F–19.
(a) [This section applies to:
(1) A licensed naturopathic doctor;
(2) A licensed health care practitioner;
(3) A health care facility, as defined in § 19–114 of the Health – General
Article, located in the State; and
(4) A State agency.
(b) A person listed in subsection (a) of this section shall file a written report with
the Board if the person has information that gives the person reason to believe that a
licensed naturopathic doctor is or may be:
(1) Medically or legally incompetent;
(2) Engaged in the unauthorized practice of naturopathic medicine;
(3) Guilty of unprofessional conduct; or
(4) Mentally or physically unable to engage safely in the practice of
naturopathic medicine.
– 82 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(c) A person required to file a report under subsection (b) of this section shall file
the report within 30 days after becoming aware of the information.
(d)] A [health care facility shall report promptly to the Board] HOSPITAL, A
RELATED INSTITUTION, AN ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM, AND AN EMPLOYER
SHALL SUBMIT TO THE BOARD A REPORT if:
(1) A licensed naturopathic doctor voluntarily resigns from the staff of the
[health care facility] HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER, voluntarily limits the licensee’s staff privileges, or fails to
reapply for [hospital] privileges at the [health care facility] HOSPITAL, RELATED
INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER; and
(2) The action of the licensee occurs while the licensee is under formal or
informal investigation by the [health care facility] HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION,
ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER for possible medical incompetence,
unprofessional conduct, or mental or physical impairment.
(B) (A) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (C) (B) AND (E) (D)
OF THIS SECTION, EACH HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, AND EMPLOYER OF A LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR SHALL FILE WITH
SUBMIT TO THE BOARD A REPORT THAT THE HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION,
ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER LIMITED, REDUCED, OTHERWISE
CHANGED, OR TERMINATED ANY LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR FOR ANY
REASON IF:
(I) THE EMPLOYER:
1. REDUCED, SUSPENDED, REVOKED, RESTRICTED,
DENIED, CONDITIONED, OR DID NOT RENEW THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC
DOCTOR’S CLINICAL PRIVILEGES, EMPLOYMENT, OR OTHER ABILITY TO PRACTICE
OR TREAT PATIENTS;
2. INVOLUNTARILY TERMINATED OR RESTRICTED THE
LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR’S EMPLOYMENT OR STAFF MEMBERSHIP; OR
3. ASKED THE LICENSEE TO VOLUNTARILY RESIGN
BECAUSE OF THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR’S CONDUCT OR WHILE THE
LICENSEE IS BEING INVESTIGATED; AND
(II) THE ACTION DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH WAS TAKEN:
– 83 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. FOR REASONS THAT MIGHT BE GROUNDS FOR
DISCIPLINARY ACTION UNDER § 14–5F–18 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
2. BECAUSE THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR
MAY HAVE ENGAGED IN AN ACT THAT MAY CONSTITUTE UNPROFESSIONAL
CONDUCT;
3. BECAUSE THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR
MAY BE UNABLE TO PRACTICE NATUROPATHY WITH REASONABLE SKILL AND
SAFETY BECAUSE OF A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL CONDITION OR PROFESSIONAL
INCOMPETENCE; OR
4. BECAUSE THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR
MAY HAVE HARMED OR PLACED ONE OR MORE PATIENTS OR THE PUBLIC AT
UNREASONABLE RISK OF HARM BY ENGAGING IN AN ACT THAT CREATES AN
IMMEDIATE OR CONTINUING DANGER.
(2) A REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE ACTION TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER;
(II) A DETAILED EXPLANATION OF THE REASONS FOR THE
ACTION, INCLUDING REFERENCES TO SPECIFIC PATIENT MEDICAL RECORDS, IF
ANY, THAT INFORMED THE EMPLOYER’S ACTION; AND
(III) THE STEPS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER TO INVESTIGATE THE
CONDUCT OF THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR.
(3) (I) THE BOARD MAY REQUEST FROM THE EMPLOYER
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REGARDING AN ACTION DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT WAS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER.
(II) IF AN EMPLOYER RECEIVES A REQUEST MADE UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE EMPLOYER SHALL PROMPTLY
PROVIDE THE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION.
(C) (B) A HOSPITAL, A RELATED INSTITUTION, AN ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR AN IF AN EMPLOYER THAT HAS REASON TO KNOW THAT KNOWS THAT
THE CONDUCT OF A LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR HAS COMMITTED AN ACTION
OR HAS A CONDITION THAT MIGHT BE GROUNDS FOR REPRIMAND OR PROBATION OF
THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR OR SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF THE
LICENSE REQUIRES THAT THE EMPLOYER SUBMIT A REPORT UNDER SUBSECTION
– 84 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(A)(1) OF THIS SECTION BECAUSE THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR IS
ALCOHOL–IMPAIRED OR DRUG–IMPAIRED IMPAIRED BY ALCOHOL OR ANOTHER
SUBSTANCE, THE EMPLOYER IS NOT REQUIRED TO REPORT THE NATUROPATHIC
DOCTOR TO THE BOARD IF:
(1) THE HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER KNOWS THAT THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR IS:
(I) IN AN ALCOHOL OR DRUG SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER
TREATMENT PROGRAM THAT IS ACCREDITED BY THE JOINT COMMISSION OR IS
CERTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT; OR
(II) UNDER THE CARE OF A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER WHO
IS COMPETENT AND CAPABLE OF DEALING WITH ALCOHOLISM AND DRUG ABUSE
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS;
(2) THE HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER IS ABLE TO VERIFY THAT THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC
DOCTOR REMAINS IN THE TREATMENT PROGRAM UNTIL SUCCESSFUL DISCHARGE;
AND
(3) THE ACTION OR CONDITION OF THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC
DOCTOR HAS NOT CAUSED INJURY TO ANY PERSON WHILE THE PRACTITIONER
NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR IS PRACTICING AS A LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR.
(D) (C) (1) IF THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR ENTERS OR IS
CONSIDERING ENTERING AN ALCOHOL OR DRUG TREATMENT PROGRAM THAT IS
ACCREDITED BY THE JOINT COMMISSION OR THAT IS CERTIFIED BY THE
DEPARTMENT, THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR SHALL NOTIFY THE
HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER
WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR’S DECISION TO
ENTER THE TREATMENT PROGRAM.
(2) IF THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR FAILS TO PROVIDE
THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND THE
HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER
LEARNS THAT THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR HAS ENTERED A TREATMENT
PROGRAM, THE HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM,
OR EMPLOYER SHALL REPORT TO THE BOARD THAT THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC
DOCTOR HAS ENTERED A TREATMENT PROGRAM AND HAS FAILED TO PROVIDE THE
REQUIRED NOTICE.
– 85 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) IF THE TREATMENT PROGRAM FINDS THAT THE LICENSED
NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR IS NONCOMPLIANT WITH THE TREATMENT PROGRAM’S
POLICIES AND PROCEDURES WHILE IN THE TREATMENT PROGRAM, THE TREATMENT
PROGRAM SHALL NOTIFY THE HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE
HEALTH SYSTEM, OR EMPLOYER OF THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR’S
NONCOMPLIANCE.
(4) ON RECEIPT OF A NOTIFICATION MADE UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE HOSPITAL, RELATED INSTITUTION, ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR IF THE EMPLOYER KNOWS THAT THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN IS
NONCOMPLIANT WITH THE SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT PROGRAMS,
THE EMPLOYER OF THE LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR SHALL REPORT THE
LICENSED NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR’S NONCOMPLIANCE TO THE BOARD.
(D) (1) THE BOARD MAY EXTEND THE REPORTING UNDER THIS SECTION
FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN.
(E) (2) A PERSON IS NOT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION TO MAKE ANY
REPORT THAT WOULD BE IN VIOLATION OF ANY FEDERAL OR STATE LAW, RULE, OR
REGULATION CONCERNING THE CONFIDENTIALITY OF ALCOHOL AND DRUG ABUSE
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER PATIENT RECORDS.
(E) THE BOARD MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION BY SUBPOENA.
(F) ANY PERSON SHALL HAVE THE IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY DESCRIBED
UNDER § 5–715(D) OF THE COURTS ARTICLE FOR GIVING ANY OF THE INFORMATION
REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION.
(F) (G) A HOSPITAL, A RELATED INSTITUTION, AN ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
SYSTEM, OR AN AN EMPLOYER REQUIRED TO MAKE A REPORT TO THE BOARD UNDER
THIS SECTION SHALL SUBMIT THE REPORT WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE ACTION
REQUIRING THE REPORT.
(G) (H) A REPORT MADE UNDER THIS SECTION IS PRIVILEGED, NOT
SUBJECT TO INSPECTION UNDER THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT, AND NOT
SUBJECT TO SUBPOENA OR DISCOVERY IN ANY CIVIL ACTION OTHER THAN A
PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF A HEARING AND DECISION OF THE BOARD OR A
DISCIPLINARY PANEL UNDER THIS TITLE.
(H) (I) (1) A DISCIPLINARY PANEL MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY OF
UP TO $5,000 FOR FAILURE KNOWINGLY FAILING TO REPORT UNDER THIS SECTION.
– 86 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(2) A DISCIPLINARY PANEL MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY OF UP TO
$5,000 PER INCIDENT FOR A REPORT MADE BY AN EMPLOYER IN BAD FAITH.
(3) THE BOARD SHALL REMIT ANY PENALTY COLLECTED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION INTO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
[14–5F–20.
(a) The Board shall investigate any complaint filed with the Board that alleges
that there are grounds for action under § 14–5F–18 of this subtitle.
(b) After the Board’s investigation, the Board or a disciplinary panel, on the
affirmative vote of a majority of its members then serving, may commence action on any of
the grounds set forth in § 14–5F–18 of this subtitle.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, until the Board
or a disciplinary panel passes an order under § 14–5F–22 of this subtitle, each related
investigation, report, and recommendation is confidential.
(2) On the request of a person who has made a complaint to the Board, the
Board shall provide the person with information on the status of the complaint.]
14–5F–20.
(A) FOLLOWING THE FILING OF CHARGES OR NOTICE OF INITIAL DENIAL OF
A LICENSE APPLICATION, THE BOARD SHALL DISCLOSE THE FILING TO THE PUBLIC
ON THE BOARD’S WEBSITE.
(B) THE BOARD SHALL CREATE AND MAINTAIN A PUBLIC INDIVIDUAL
PROFILE ON EACH LICENSEE THAT INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(1) A SUMMARY OF CHARGES FILED AGAINST THE LICENSEE,
INCLUDING A COPY OF THE CHARGING DOCUMENT, UNTIL A DISCIPLINARY PANEL
HAS TAKEN ACTION UNDER § 14–5F–18 OF THIS SUBTITLE BASED ON THE CHARGES
OR HAS RESCINDED THE CHARGES;
(2) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY DISCIPLINARY ACTION TAKEN BY THE
BOARD OR A DISCIPLINARY PANEL AGAINST THE LICENSEE WITHIN THE MOST
RECENT 10–YEAR PERIOD THAT INCLUDES A COPY OF THE PUBLIC ORDER;
(3) A DESCRIPTION IN SUMMARY FORM OF ANY FINAL DISCIPLINARY
ACTION TAKEN BY A LICENSING BOARD IN ANY OTHER STATE OR JURISDICTION
AGAINST THE LICENSEE WITHIN THE MOST RECENT 10–YEAR PERIOD IF THE BOARD
KNOWS ABOUT THE DISCIPLINARY ACTION;
– 87 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) A DESCRIPTION OF A CONVICTION OR ENTRY OF A PLEA OF
GUILTY OR NOLO CONTENDERE BY THE LICENSEE FOR A CRIME INVOLVING MORAL
TURPITUDE THAT IS THE BASIS FOR DISCIPLINARY ACTION TAKEN UNDER §
14–5F–18(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(5) THE PUBLIC ADDRESS OF THE LICENSEE.
(C) IN ADDITION TO THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION, THE BOARD SHALL INCLUDE ON EACH LICENSEE’S PROFILE A
STATEMENT OF INFORMATION TO BE TAKEN INTO CONSIDERATION BY A CONSUMER
WHEN VIEWING A LICENSEE’S PROFILE, INCLUDING A DISCLAIMER STATING THAT A
CHARGING DOCUMENT DOES NOT INDICATE A FINAL FINDING OF GUILT BY A
DISCIPLINARY PANEL.
(D) THE BOARD:
(1) ON RECEIPT OF A WRITTEN REQUEST FOR A LICENSEE’S PROFILE
FROM ANY PERSON, SHALL FORWARD A WRITTEN COPY OF THE PROFILE TO THE
PERSON; AND
(2) SHALL MAINTAIN A WEBSITE THAT SERVES AS A SINGLE POINT OF
ENTRY WHERE ALL LICENSEE PROFILE INFORMATION IS AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC
ON THE INTERNET.
(E) THE BOARD SHALL PROVIDE A MECHANISM FOR THE NOTIFICATION
AND PROMPT CORRECTION OF ANY FACTUAL INACCURACIES IN A LICENSEE’S
PROFILE.
(F) THE BOARD SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION RELATING TO CHARGES
FILED AGAINST A LICENSEE BY A DISCIPLINARY PANEL AND ANY FINAL
DISCIPLINARY ACTION TAKEN BY A DISCIPLINARY PANEL AGAINST A LICENSEE IN
THE LICENSEE’S PROFILE WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE CHARGES ARE FILED OR THE
ACTION BECOMES FINAL.
14–5F–21.
[(f) If, after a hearing, an individual is found in violation of § 14–5F–18 of this
subtitle, the individual shall pay the costs of the hearing as specified in a regulation
adopted by the Board.]
14–5F–25.
(A) A disciplinary panel may issue a cease and desist order for:
– 88 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(1) Practicing naturopathic medicine without a license or with an
unauthorized person; or
(2) Supervising or aiding an unauthorized person in the practice of
naturopathic medicine.
(B) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE, A LICENSED
PHYSICIAN MAY NOT EMPLOY AN INDIVIDUAL PRACTICING NATUROPATHIC
MEDICINE WITHOUT A LICENSE OR WITHOUT A COLLABORATION AND
CONSULTATION AGREEMENT.
(C) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE, A HOSPITAL, A
RELATED INSTITUTION, AN ALTERNATIVE HEALTH SYSTEM, OR AN EMPLOYER MAY
NOT EMPLOY AN INDIVIDUAL PRACTICING NATUROPATHIC MEDICINE WITHOUT A
LICENSE OR WITHOUT A COLLABORATION AND CONSULTATION AGREEMENT.
(D) A DISCIPLINARY PANEL MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY OF UP TO $5,000
FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(E) THE BOARD SHALL REMIT ANY PENALTY COLLECTED UNDER THIS
SECTION INTO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
14–5G–05.
There is a Genetic Counseling Advisory Committee within the Board.
14–5G–06.
(a) The Committee consists of members appointed by the Board as follows:
(1) Three shall be [individuals who practice genetic counseling and who:
(i) On or before December 31, 2023, are certified genetic counselors;
and
(ii) On or after January 1, 2024, are] licensed genetic counselors;
(2) Three shall be [practicing] licensed physicians; and
(3) One shall be a consumer member.
(b) Each [genetic counselor member of the Committee must be:
(1) In] MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE LICENSED BY THE BOARD MUST
BE IN good standing with the Board[; and
– 89 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) A resident of the State who has at least 1 year of active genetic
counseling experience within the 5–year period immediately preceding the date of the
appointment].
(c) The licensed physician members of the Committee must[:
(1) Be in good standing with the Board; and
(2) Have] HAVE experience working with genetic counselors.
(d) The consumer member of the Committee:
(1) Must be a member of the general public;
(2) May not be or ever have been:
(i) A genetic counselor;
(ii) Any OTHER health care professional; or
(iii) In training to be a genetic counselor or other health professional;
and
(3) May not:
(i) Participate or ever have participated in a commercial or
professional field related to genetic counseling;
(ii) Have a household member who participates in a commercial or
professional field related to genetic counseling; [or]
(iii) Have had within 2 years before appointment a financial interest
in a person regulated by the Board; OR
(IV) HAVE HAD WITHIN 2 YEARS BEFORE APPOINTMENT A
FINANCIAL INTEREST IN THE PROVISION OF GOODS OR SERVICES TO GENETIC
COUNSELORS OR TO THE FIELD OF GENETIC COUNSELING.
(E) EACH MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE MUST BE A RESIDENT OF THE
STATE.
[(e)] (F) (1) The term of a member is 3 years.
– 90 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(2) The terms of members are staggered as required by [the terms provided
for members of the Committee on January 1, 2022] REGULATION.
(3) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies.
(4) A member may not serve more than two consecutive full terms.
(5) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for the
rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
[(f)] (G) From among its members, the Committee shall elect a chair every 2
years.
[(g)] (H) A quorum of the Committee consists of five members.
14–5G–07.
[(a)] In addition to the powers set forth elsewhere in this subtitle, the Committee
shall:
(1) SHALL:
(1) (I) Develop and recommend to the Board [regulations]:
(I) 1. REGULATIONS to carry out this subtitle; AND
(II) 2. ANY STATUTORY CHANGES THAT AFFECT THE
PROFESSION; AND
(2) (II) [Develop and recommend to the Board a code of ethics for the
practice of genetic counseling;
(3) Develop and recommend to the Board continuing education
requirements for license renewal;
(4) Develop and recommend to the Board criteria for individuals who are
licensed to practice genetic counseling in another state or territory of the United States to
become licensed in this State;
(5) Evaluate the credentials of applicants as necessary and recommend
licensure of applicants who fulfill the requirements for a license to practice genetic
counseling;
– 91 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(6) On request, develop and recommend to the Board standards of care for
the practice of genetic counseling;
(7) Provide the Board with recommendations concerning the practice of
genetic counseling;
(8)] Keep a record of its [proceedings] MEETINGS; and
[(9) Submit an annual report to the Board.]
(3) ON REQUEST OF THE BOARD OR A DISCIPLINARY PANEL:
(2) MAY:
(I) PROVIDE RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING THE PRACTICE
OF GENETIC COUNSELING; AND
(II) ADVISE THE BOARD ON ANY OTHER MATTERS RELATED TO
GENETIC COUNSELORS.
[(b) The Board shall:
(1) Consider all recommendations of the Committee; and
(2) Provide to the Committee an annual report on the disciplinary matters
involving licensees.]
14–5G–08.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) [An individual] A GENETIC COUNSELOR who is employed [by the
United States] IN THE SERVICE OF THE FEDERAL government [to practice genetic
counseling] while practicing within the scope of [that] THE employment;
14–5G–09.
(a) To qualify for a license to practice genetic counseling, an applicant shall be an
individual who meets the requirements of this section.
(b) The applicant must be of good moral character.
(c) The applicant must be at least 18 years old.
– 92 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(d) The applicant must be a graduate of an appropriate education program
approved by the Board.
(e) [Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, the] THE applicant shall
submit to the Board satisfactory evidence of certification by a national certifying
organization approved by the Board.
(f) [If an applicant does not meet the requirement under subsection (e) of this
section, the applicant may qualify for licensure if the applicant:
(1) Has worked as a genetic counselor for:
(i) At least 10 years before January 1, 2024; and
(ii) At least 5 consecutive years immediately preceding the date on
which the applicant submits the application for licensure;
(2) Has graduated from an education program approved by the Board;
(3) Submits to the Board three letters of recommendation from licensed
physicians who have been licensed for at least 5 years or certified genetic counselors eligible
for licensure and who:
(i) Have worked with the applicant in an employment or
professional setting for 3 years before the applicant submits the application for licensure;
and
(ii) Can attest to the applicant’s competency in providing genetic
counseling services; and
(4) Applies for initial licensure on or before December 31, 2024.
(g)] The applicant shall complete a criminal history records check in accordance
with § 14–308.1 of this title.
[(h)] (G) The applicant shall meet any additional education, training, or
examination requirements established by the Board.
14–5G–15.
(a) A licensee shall notify the Board in writing of a change of name or address
within [60] 10 30 days after the change.
14–5G–18.
– 93 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of the quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(3) Is guilty of [unprofessional or immoral]:
(I) IMMORAL conduct while practicing genetic counseling; OR
(II) UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT WHILE PRACTICING GENETIC
COUNSELING;
(4) Is [professionally, physically, or mentally]:
(I) PROFESSIONALLY INCOMPETENT;
(II) PHYSICALLY INCOMPETENT; OR
(III) MENTALLY incompetent;
(14) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY makes a misrepresentation while practicing
genetic counseling;
(15) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY practices genetic counseling with an
unauthorized individual or aids an unauthorized individual in practicing genetic
counseling;
(16) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY delegates a genetic counseling duty to an
unlicensed individual;
(17) [Grossly overutilizes] ESTABLISHES A PATTERN OF
OVERUTILIZATION OF health care services EXCESSIVE OR MEDICALLY UNNECESSARY
PROCEDURES OR TREATMENT;
(21) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY submits false statements to collect fees for
which services are not provided;
(23) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY fails to report suspected child abuse in
violation of § 5–704 of the Family Law Article;
14–5G–20.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (d) of this section, [hospitals,
related institutions, alternative health systems as defined in § 1–401 of this article, and
employers] EACH EMPLOYER OF A LICENSED GENETIC COUNSELOR shall [file with]
– 94 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
SUBMIT TO the Board a report [that the hospital, related institution, alternative health
system, or employer limited, reduced, otherwise changed, or terminated any licensed
genetic counselor for any reason] IF:
(I) THE EMPLOYER:
1. REDUCED, SUSPENDED, REVOKED, RESTRICTED,
DENIED, CONDITIONED, OR DID NOT RENEW THE LICENSED GENETIC COUNSELOR’S
CLINICAL PRIVILEGES, EMPLOYMENT, OR OTHER ABILITY TO PRACTICE OR TREAT
PATIENTS;
2. INVOLUNTARILY TERMINATED OR RESTRICTED THE
LICENSED GENETIC COUNSELOR’S EMPLOYMENT OR STAFF MEMBERSHIP; OR
3. ASKED THE LICENSED GENETIC COUNSELOR TO
VOLUNTARILY RESIGN BECAUSE OF THE LICENSED GENETIC COUNSELOR’S
CONDUCT OR WHILE THE LICENSED GENETIC COUNSELOR IS BEING INVESTIGATED;
AND
(II) THE ACTION DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH WAS TAKEN:
1. FOR REASONS that might be grounds for disciplinary
action under § 14–5G–18 of this subtitle;
2. BECAUSE THE LICENSED GENETIC COUNSELOR MAY
HAVE ENGAGED IN AN ACT THAT MAY CONSTITUTE UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT;
3. BECAUSE THE LICENSED GENETIC COUNSELOR MAY
BE UNABLE TO PRACTICE GENETIC COUNSELING WITH REASONABLE SKILL AND
SAFETY BECAUSE OF A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL CONDITION OR PROFESSIONAL
INCOMPETENCE; OR
4. BECAUSE THE LICENSED GENETIC COUNSELOR MAY
HAVE HARMED OR PLACED ONE OR MORE PATIENTS OR THE PUBLIC AT
UNREASONABLE RISK OF HARM BY ENGAGING IN AN ACT THAT CREATES AN
IMMEDIATE OR CONTINUING DANGER.
(2) A REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE ACTION TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER;
– 95 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) A DETAILED EXPLANATION OF THE REASONS FOR THE
ACTION, INCLUDING REFERENCES TO SPECIFIC PATIENT MEDICAL RECORDS, IF
ANY, THAT INFORMED THE EMPLOYER’S ACTION; AND
(III) THE STEPS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER TO INVESTIGATE THE
CONDUCT OF THE LICENSED GENETIC COUNSELOR.
(3) (I) THE BOARD MAY REQUEST FROM THE EMPLOYER
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REGARDING AN ACTION DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT WAS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER.
(II) IF AN EMPLOYER RECEIVES A REQUEST MADE UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE EMPLOYER SHALL PROMPTLY
PROVIDE THE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION.
(b) [A hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or] IF AN employer
[that has reason to know that] KNOWS THAT THE CONDUCT OF a licensed genetic
counselor [has committed an act or has a condition that might be grounds for reprimand or
probation of the licensed genetic counselor or suspension or revocation of the license]
REQUIRES THAT THE EMPLOYER SUBMIT A REPORT because the licensed genetic
counselor is [alcohol–impaired or drug–impaired] IMPAIRED BY ALCOHOL OR ANOTHER
SUBSTANCE, THE EMPLOYER is not required to report the licensed genetic counselor to
the Board if:
(1) The [hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or]
employer knows that the licensed genetic counselor is:
(i) In [an alcohol or drug] SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER treatment
program that is accredited by [the] THE Joint Commission [on Accreditation of Healthcare
Organizations] or that is certified by the Department; or
(ii) Under the care of a health care practitioner who is competent
and capable of dealing with [alcoholism and drug abuse] SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS;
and
(2) (i) The [hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or]
employer is able to verify that the licensed genetic counselor remains in the treatment
program until SUCCESSFUL discharge; and
(ii) The action or condition of the licensed genetic counselor has not
caused injury to any person while the genetic counselor is practicing AS A LICENSED
genetic [counseling] COUNSELOR.
– 96 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(c) (1) If the licensed genetic counselor enters, or is considering entering, an
alcohol or drug treatment program that is accredited by [the] THE Joint Commission [on
Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations] or that is certified by the Department, the
licensed genetic counselor shall notify the hospital, related institution, alternative health
system, or employer [of] WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER the licensed genetic counselor’s decision
to enter the treatment program.
[(2) If the licensed genetic counselor fails to provide the notice required
under paragraph (1) of this subsection, and the hospital, related institution, alternative
health system, or employer learns that the licensed genetic counselor has entered a
treatment program, the hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or
employer shall report to the Board that the licensed genetic counselor has entered a
treatment program and has failed to provide the required notice.
(3) If the licensed genetic counselor is found to be noncompliant with the
treatment program’s policies and procedures while in the treatment program, the
treatment program shall notify the hospital, related institution, alternative health system,
or employer of the licensed genetic counselor’s noncompliance.
(4) On receipt of the notification required under paragraph (3) of this
subsection, the hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or] IF THE
EMPLOYER KNOWS THAT THE LICENSED GENETIC COUNSELOR IS NONCOMPLIANT
WITH THE SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT PROGRAM, THE employer of the
licensed genetic counselor shall report the licensed genetic counselor’s noncompliance to
the Board.
(d) (1) THE BOARD MAY EXTEND THE REPORTING UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN.
(2) A person is not required under this section to make any report that
would be in violation of any federal or State law, rule, or regulation concerning the
confidentiality of [alcohol– and drug abuse–related] SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER patient
records.
(E) THE BOARD MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION BY SUBPOENA.
(F) ANY PERSON SHALL HAVE THE IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY DESCRIBED
UNDER § 5–715(D) OF THE COURTS ARTICLE FOR GIVING ANY OF THE INFORMATION
REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION.
[(e)] (G) [The hospital, related institution, alternative health system, or] AN
employer REQUIRED TO MAKE A REPORT TO THE BOARD UNDER THIS SECTION shall
submit the report within 10 days after [any] THE action [described in this section]
REQUIRING THE REPORT.
– 97 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(f)] (H) A report made under this section is PRIVILEGED, NOT SUBJECT TO
INSPECTION UNDER THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT, AND not subject to subpoena or
discovery in any civil action other than a proceeding arising out of a hearing and decision
of the Board or a disciplinary panel under this title.
(g) (I) (1) A disciplinary panel may impose a civil penalty of up to [$1,000]
$5,000 for failure KNOWINGLY FAILING to report under this section.
(2) A DISCIPLINARY PANEL MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY OF UP TO
$5,000 PER INCIDENT FOR A REPORT MADE BY AN EMPLOYER IN BAD FAITH.
(3) The Board shall remit any penalty collected under this subsection into
the General Fund of the State.
14–5G–26.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a licensed genetic counselor or
a licensed physician may not employ or supervise an individual practicing genetic
counseling without a license.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a hospital, related institution,
alternative health system, or AN employer may not employ an individual practicing genetic
counseling without a license.
(c) A disciplinary panel may impose a civil penalty of up to [$1,000] $5,000 for a
violation of this section.
14–5G–27.
(a) A person who violates [any provision of §§ 14–5G–23 through 14–5G–26] §
14–5G–23, § 14–5G–24, OR § 14–5G–25 of this subtitle is guilty of a misdemeanor and
on conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 1 year
or both.
(b) A person who violates [any provision of §§ 14–5G–23 through 14–5G–26] §
14–5G–23, § 14–5G–24, OR § 14–5G–25 of this subtitle is subject to a civil fine of not
more than $5,000 to be levied by a disciplinary panel.
(c) The Board shall pay any penalty collected under this section into the Board of
Physicians Fund.
14–602.
– 98 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this article, a person may not use the words
or terms “Dr.”, “doctor”, “physician”, “D.O.”, or “M.D.” with the intent to represent that the
person practices medicine, unless the person is:
(3) A physician employed [by] IN THE SERVICE OF the federal government
while [performing duties incident to that] PRACTICING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THE
employment;
14–606.
(a) (3) A person who is required to give notice under § 14–505 (“Reporting burn
treatment”) of this title, and who fails to give the required notice, [is liable for] MAY BE
SUBJECT TO a civil penalty of not more than $100.
15–103.
[(a) In this section, “alternative health care system” has the meaning stated in §
1–401 of this article.]
(b) (3) (A) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, an employer of
a physician assistant shall report to the Board, on the form prescribed by the Board, any
termination of employment of the physician assistant if the cause of termination is related
to a quality of care issue.
(2) Subject to subsection [(d)] (C) of this section, a physician or group of
physicians that develops a collaboration agreement with a physician assistant or an
employer of a physician assistant shall notify the Board within 10 days of the termination
of employment of the physician assistant for reasons that would be grounds for discipline
under this title.
(3) A physician or group of physicians that develops a collaboration
agreement with a physician assistant or the physician assistant shall [notify the Board
within 10 days of] IMMEDIATELY DOCUMENT the termination of the relationship [under
a] IN THE collaboration agreement ON FILE AT THE PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT’S PRIMARY
PLACE OF BUSINESS.
[(c)] (B) (1) Except as otherwise provided under subsections [(b) and (d)] (C)
AND (E) of this section, [a hospital, a related institution, an alternative health care system,
or an] EACH employer of a LICENSED physician assistant shall [report] SUBMIT to the
Board [any limitation, reduction, or other change of the terms of employment of the
physician assistant or any termination of employment of the physician assistant for any
reason that might be grounds for disciplinary action under § 15–314 of this title] A REPORT
IF:
(I) THE EMPLOYER:
– 99 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. REDUCED, SUSPENDED, REVOKED, RESTRICTED,
DENIED, CONDITIONED, OR DID NOT RENEW THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT’S
CLINICAL PRIVILEGES, EMPLOYMENT, OR OTHER ABILITY TO PRACTICE OR TREAT
PATIENTS;
2. INVOLUNTARILY TERMINATED OR RESTRICTED THE
LICENSED PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT’S EMPLOYMENT OR STAFF MEMBERSHIP; OR
3. ASKED THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT TO
VOLUNTARILY RESIGN BECAUSE OF THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT’S
CONDUCT OR WHILE THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT IS BEING INVESTIGATED;
AND
(II) THE ACTION DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH WAS TAKEN:
1. FOR REASONS THAT MIGHT BE GROUNDS FOR
DISCIPLINARY ACTION UNDER § 15–314 OF THIS TITLE;
2. BECAUSE THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT MAY
HAVE ENGAGED IN AN ACT THAT MAY CONSTITUTE UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT;
3. BECAUSE THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT MAY
BE UNABLE TO PRACTICE AS A PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT WITH REASONABLE SKILL AND
SAFETY BECAUSE OF A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL CONDITION OR PROFESSIONAL
INCOMPETENCE; OR
4. BECAUSE THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT MAY
HAVE HARMED OR PLACED ONE OR MORE PATIENTS OR THE PUBLIC AT
UNREASONABLE RISK OF HARM BY ENGAGING IN AN ACT THAT CREATES AN
IMMEDIATE OR CONTINUING DANGER.
(2) EACH REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE ACTION TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER;
(II) A DETAILED EXPLANATION OF THE REASONS FOR THE
ACTION, INCLUDING REFERENCES TO SPECIFIC PATIENT MEDICAL RECORDS, IF
ANY, THAT INFORMED THE EMPLOYER’S ACTION; AND
– 100 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(III) THE STEPS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER TO INVESTIGATE THE
CONDUCT OF THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT.
(3) (I) THE BOARD MAY REQUEST FROM THE EMPLOYER
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REGARDING AN ACTION DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT WAS TAKEN BY THE EMPLOYER.
(II) IF AN EMPLOYER RECEIVES A REQUEST MADE UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE EMPLOYER SHALL PROMPTLY
PROVIDE THE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION.
[(d)] (C) [A hospital, related institution, alternative health care system, or] IF
AN employer [that has reason to know that] KNOWS THAT THE CONDUCT OF a LICENSED
physician assistant [has committed an action or has a condition that might be grounds for
reprimand or probation of the physician assistant or suspension or revocation of the license
of the physician assistant under § 15–314 of this title] REQUIRES THAT THE EMPLOYER
SUBMIT A REPORT UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION because the physician
assistant is [alcohol– or drug–impaired] IMPAIRED BY ALCOHOL OR ANOTHER
SUBSTANCE, THE EMPLOYER is not required to report THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN
ASSISTANT to the Board if:
(1) The [hospital, related institution, alternative health care system, or]
employer knows that the LICENSED physician assistant is:
(i) In [an alcohol or drug] SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER treatment
program that is accredited by [the] THE Joint Commission [on the Accreditation of
Healthcare Organizations] or is certified by the Department; or
(ii) Under the care of a health care practitioner who is competent
and capable of dealing with [alcoholism and drug abuse] SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS;
(2) The [hospital, related institution, alternative health care system, or]
employer is able to verify that the physician assistant remains in the treatment program
until SUCCESSFUL discharge; and
(3) The action or condition of the physician assistant has not caused injury
to any person while the physician assistant is practicing as a licensed physician assistant.
(e) (D) (1) If the physician assistant enters, or is considering entering, an
alcohol or drug treatment program that is accredited by [the] THE Joint Commission [on
Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations] or that is certified by the Department, the
physician assistant shall notify the hospital, related institution, alternative health care
system, or employer [of] WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER the physician assistant’s decision to
enter the treatment program.
– 101 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) If the physician assistant fails to provide the notice required under
paragraph (1) of this subsection, and the hospital, related institution, alternative health
care system, or employer learns that the physician assistant has entered a treatment
program, the hospital, related institution, alternative health care system, or employer shall
report to the Board that the physician assistant has entered a treatment program and has
failed to provide the required notice
[(3) If the physician assistant is found to be noncompliant with the
treatment program’s policies and procedures while in the treatment program, the
treatment program shall notify the hospital, related institution, alternative health care
system, or employer of the physician assistant’s noncompliance.
(4) On receipt of the notification required under paragraph (3) of this
subsection, the hospital, related institution, alternative health care system, or] IF THE
EMPLOYER KNOWS THAT THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN IS NONCOMPLIANT WITH THE
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT PROGRAM, THE employer of the LICENSED
physician assistant shall report the LICENSED physician assistant’s noncompliance to the
Board.
[(f)] (E) (1) THE BOARD MAY EXTEND THE REPORTING UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN.
(2) A person is not required under this section to make any report that
would be in violation of any federal or State law, rule, or regulation concerning the
confidentiality of [alcohol– and drug–abuse] SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER patient records.
(F) THE BOARD MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION BY SUBPOENA.
(G) ANY PERSON SHALL HAVE THE IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY DESCRIBED
UNDER § 5–715(D) OF THE COURTS ARTICLE FOR GIVING ANY OF THE INFORMATION
REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION.
[(g)] (H) [The hospital, related institution, alternative health care system, or]
AN employer REQUIRED TO MAKE A REPORT TO THE BOARD UNDER THIS SECTION
shall submit the report within 10 days [of any] AFTER THE action [described in this
section] REQUIRING THE REPORT.
[(h)] (I) A report under this section is PRIVILEGED, NOT SUBJECT TO
INSPECTION UNDER THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT, AND not subject to subpoena or
discovery in any civil action other than a proceeding arising out of a hearing and decision
of the Board or a disciplinary panel under this title.
– 102 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(i) (J) (1) A disciplinary panel may impose a civil penalty of up to [$1,000] $5,000
for failure KNOWINGLY FAILING to report under this section.
(2) A DISCIPLINARY PANEL MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY OF UP TO
$5,000 PER INCIDENT FOR A REPORT MADE BY AN EMPLOYER IN BAD FAITH.
(3) The Board shall pay any fees collected under this subsection into the
General Fund of the State.
[(j)] (K) An employer shall make the report required under this section to the
Board within 5 days after the date of termination of employment.
[(k)] (L) The Board shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this
section.
15–201.
(a) There is a Physician Assistant Advisory Committee within the Board.
15–202.
(a) (1) The Committee shall consist of [7] SEVEN members appointed by the
Board.
(2) Of the [7] SEVEN Committee members:
(i) [3] THREE shall be licensed physicians;
(ii) [3] THREE shall be licensed physician assistants; and
(iii) [1] ONE shall be a consumer.
(3) Of the licensed physician members:
(i) At least [1] ONE shall specialize in general surgery or a surgical
subspecialty; and
(ii) At least [1] ONE shall specialize in internal medicine, family
practice, or a similar primary care specialty.
(4) The Board shall appoint the physician assistant members from a list of
names submitted by:
(i) The Maryland Academy of Physician Assistants; and
– 103 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) The State institutions of higher education with approved
physician assistant programs.
(5) EACH MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE LICENSED BY THE BOARD
MUST BE IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE BOARD.
[(5)] (6) The consumer member:
(i) [Shall] MUST be a member of the general public;
(ii) May not be [a physician, former physician, physician assistant,
or a person in training to become a physician or physician assistant] OR HAVE EVER BEEN:
1. A PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT;
2. ANY OTHER HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL; OR
3. IN TRAINING TO BE A PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT OR
OTHER HEALTH PROFESSIONAL; AND
(iii) May not [have a household member who is a physician or
physician assistant, or a person in training to become a physician assistant; and
(iv) May not have had within 2 years before appointment a
substantial financial interest in a process regulated by the Board]:
1. PARTICIPATE OR EVER HAVE PARTICIPATED IN A
COMMERCIAL OR PROFESSIONAL FIELD RELATED TO PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT
PRACTICE;
2. HAVE A HOUSEHOLD MEMBER WHO PARTICIPATES IN
A COMMERCIAL OR PROFESSIONAL FIELD RELATED TO PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT
PRACTICE;
3. HAVE HAD WITHIN 2 YEARS BEFORE APPOINTMENT A
FINANCIAL INTEREST IN A PERSON REGULATED BY THE BOARD; OR
4. HAVE HAD WITHIN 2 YEARS BEFORE APPOINTMENT A
FINANCIAL INTEREST IN THE PROVISION OF GOODS OR SERVICES TO PHYSICIAN
ASSISTANTS OR TO THE FIELD OF PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT PRACTICE.
[(6)] (7) Each member of the Committee [shall] MUST be a resident of the
State.
– 104 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(b) Of the three physician members of the Committee, two shall be previously or
currently serving as a patient care team physician under a collaboration agreement with a
physician assistant.
(c) [(1) The physician assistant members shall be licensed as a physician
assistant under this title.
(2) The physician assistant members shall be currently practicing as a
physician assistant or employed as a faculty member of an accredited physician assistant
program.
(3)] Of the [3] THREE physician assistant members of the Committee:
[(i)] (1) At least [1 shall] ONE MUST be currently practicing in a
hospital; and
[(ii)] (2) At least [1 shall] ONE MUST be currently practicing in a
nonhospital setting.
(D) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS 3 YEARS.
(2) THE TERMS OF MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS REQUIRED BY
REGULATION.
(3) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL
A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(4) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
(5) A MEMBER MAY NOT SERVE MORE THAN TWO CONSECUTIVE FULL
TERMS.
[(d)] (E) [A] FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS, THE Committee SHALL ELECT A
chair [and a secretary shall be selected] every 2 years [by a majority vote of the membership
of the Committee].
[(e)] (F) The chair, or the chair’s designee, shall serve in an advisory capacity to
the Board as a representative of the Committee.
(G) A QUORUM OF THE COMMITTEE CONSISTS OF FOUR MEMBERS.
15–205.
– 105 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(a)] In addition to the powers set forth elsewhere in this title, the Committee[, on
its initiative or on the Board’s request, may] SHALL:
(1) SHALL:
(1) (I) Recommend to the Board [regulations]:
(I) 1. REGULATIONS for carrying out [the provisions of] this
title; AND
(II) 2. ANY STATUTORY CHANGES THAT AFFECT THE
PROFESSION; AND
(2) (II) Recommend to the Board approval, modification, or disapproval
of an application for licensure OR THE PERFORMANCE OF ADVANCED DUTIES UNDER A
COLLABORATION AGREEMENT;
(3) (III) Report to the Board any conduct of a physician or group of
physicians who develops a collaboration agreement with a physician assistant or a
physician assistant that may be cause for disciplinary action under this title or under §
14–404 of this article; [and]
(4) (IV) [Report to the Board any alleged unauthorized practice of a
physician assistant] KEEP A RECORD OF ITS MEETINGS; AND
(5) ON REQUEST OF THE BOARD OR A DISCIPLINARY PANEL:
(2) MAY:
(I) PROVIDE RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING THE PRACTICE
OF PHYSICIAN ASSISTANTS; AND
(II) ADVISE THE BOARD ON ANY OTHER MATTERS RELATED TO
PHYSICIAN ASSISTANTS.
[(b) The Committee shall submit an annual report to the Board.
(c) (1) In addition to the duties set forth elsewhere in this title, the Board shall
adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this title.
(2) The Board shall:
(i) Consider all recommendations of the Committee; and
– 106 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
(ii) Provide to the Committee an annual report on the disciplinary
matters involving licensees.
(3) The Board may:
(i) Investigate any alleged unauthorized practice of a physician
assistant;
(ii) Investigate any conduct that may be cause for disciplinary action
under this title; and
(iii) On receipt of a written and signed complaint, including a referral
from the Commissioner of Labor and Industry, conduct an unannounced inspection of the
office of a physician assistant, other than an office of a physician assistant in a hospital,
related institution, freestanding medical facility, or freestanding birthing center, to
determine compliance at that office with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s
guidelines on universal precautions.
(4) If the entry is necessary to carry out a duty under this subtitle,
including an investigation or determination of compliance as provided under paragraph (3)
of this subsection and an audit to determine compliance with the Board’s requirements
with respect to physician assistant practice, the Executive Director of the Board or other
duly authorized agent or investigator may enter at any reasonable hour a place of business
of a licensed physician or a licensed physician assistant or public premises.
(5) (i) A person may not deny or interfere with an entry under this
subsection.
(ii) A person who violates any provision of this subsection is guilty of
a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $100.]
15–206.
(c) [(1) In fiscal year 2017 and fiscal year 2018, if the Governor does not include
in the State budget at least $550,000 for the operation of the Maryland Loan Assistance
Repayment Program for Physicians and Physician Assistants under Title 24, Subtitle 17 of
the Health – General Article, as administered by the Department, the Comptroller shall
distribute:
(i) $550,000 of the fees received from the Board to the Department
to be used to make grants under the Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program for
Physicians and Physician Assistants under Title 24, Subtitle 17 of the Health – General
Article to physicians and physician assistants engaged in primary care or to medical
residents specializing in primary care who agree to practice for at least 2 years as primary
care physicians in a geographic area of the State that has been designated by the Secretary
as being medically underserved; and
– 107 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) The balance of the fees to the Board of Physicians Fund.
(2) In fiscal year 2019 and each fiscal year thereafter, if the Governor does
not include in the State budget at least $400,000 for the operation of the Maryland Loan
Assistance Repayment Program for Physicians and Physician Assistants under Title 24,
Subtitle 17 of the Health – General Article, as administered by the Maryland Higher
Education Commission, the Comptroller shall distribute:
(i) $400,000 of the fees received from the Board to the Department
to be used to make grants under the Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program for
Physicians and Physician Assistants under Title 24, Subtitle 17 of the Health – General
Article to physicians and physician assistants engaged in primary care or to medical
residents specializing in primary care who agree to practice for at least 2 years as primary
care physicians in a geographic area of the State that has been designated by the Secretary
as being medically underserved; and
(ii) The balance of the fees to the Board of Physicians Fund.]
(1) IN EACH FISCAL YEAR, IF THE DEPARTMENT DOES NOT
IMPLEMENT A PERMANENT FUNDING STRUCTURE UNDER § 24–1702(B)(1) OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE AND THE GOVERNOR DOES NOT INCLUDE IN THE
STATE BUDGET AT LEAST $400,000 FOR THE OPERATION OF THE MARYLAND LOAN
ASSISTANCE REPAYMENT PROGRAM FOR PHYSICIANS AND PHYSICIAN ASSISTANTS
UNDER TITLE 24, SUBTITLE 17 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE, AS
ADMINISTERED BY THE DEPARTMENT, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE:
(I) $400,000 OF THE FEES RECEIVED FROM THE BOARD TO THE
DEPARTMENT TO BE USED TO MAKE GRANTS UNDER THE MARYLAND LOAN
ASSISTANCE REPAYMENT PROGRAM FOR PHYSICIANS AND PHYSICIAN ASSISTANTS
UNDER TITLE 24, SUBTITLE 17 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE TO
PHYSICIANS AND PHYSICIAN ASSISTANTS ENGAGED IN PRIMARY CARE OR TO
MEDICAL RESIDENTS SPECIALIZING IN PRIMARY CARE WHO AGREE TO PRACTICE
FOR AT LEAST 2 YEARS AS PRIMARY CARE PHYSICIANS IN A GEOGRAPHIC AREA OF
THE STATE THAT HAS BEEN DESIGNATED BY THE SECRETARY AS BEING MEDICALLY
UNDERSERVED; AND
(II) THE BALANCE OF THE FEES TO THE BOARD OF PHYSICIANS
FUND.
[(3)] (2) If the Governor includes in the State budget at least the amount
specified in paragraph (1) [or (2)] of this subsection for the operation of the Maryland Loan
Assistance Repayment Program for Physicians and Physician Assistants under Title 24,
Subtitle 17 of the Health – General Article, as administered by the [Maryland Higher
– 108 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
Education Commission] DEPARTMENT, the Comptroller shall distribute the fees to the
Board of Physicians Fund.
15–301.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in this title, the following individuals may
practice as a physician assistant without a license:
(2) A physician assistant employed in the service of the federal government
while [performing duties incident to that] PRACTICING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THE
employment.
15–302.
(a) A physician assistant may practice as a physician assistant only after
providing notice to the Board, in a manner approved by the Board, of[:
(1) The] THE executed collaboration agreement[; and
(2) Each patient care team physician listed on the collaboration
agreement].
(j) A patient care team physician may be added or removed from a collaboration
agreement by [providing notification to the Board] IMMEDIATELY DOCUMENTING THE
ADDITION OR REMOVAL IN THE COLLABORATION AGREEMENT ON FILE AT THE
PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT’S PRIMARY PLACE OF BUSINESS.
15–302.1.
(g) (1) On review of the Committee’s recommendations regarding the request
of a patient care team physician to delegate advanced duties as described in a collaboration
agreement, the Board may modify the performance of advanced duties under a
collaboration agreement if the physician assistant does not meet the applicable education,
training, and experience requirements to perform the specified advanced duties.
(2) If the Board makes a modification under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Board:
(i) Shall notify [each] THE DELEGATING patient care team
physician listed in the collaboration agreement and the physician assistant in writing of
the particular elements of the advanced duty approval request that were the cause for the
modification; and
(ii) May not restrict the submission of an amendment to the
advanced duty.
– 109 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
15–302.2.
(a) A patient care team physician may not delegate prescribing, dispensing, and
administering of controlled dangerous substances, prescription drugs, or medical devices
unless the [primary supervising] PATIENT CARE TEAM physician and physician assistant
include in the collaboration agreement:
(1) The authority of the physician assistant to prescribe and, if applicable,
dispense controlled dangerous substances, prescription drugs, or medical devices;
(2) An attestation that all prescribing and, if applicable, dispensing
activities of the physician assistant will comply with applicable federal and State law and
regulations;
(3) An attestation that all medical charts or records will contain a notation
of any prescriptions written or dispensed by a physician assistant in accordance with this
section;
(4) An attestation that all prescriptions dispensed under this section will
include the physician assistant’s name and the patient care team physician’s name,
business address, and business telephone number legibly written or printed;
(5) An attestation that all prescriptions written under this section will
include the physician assistant’s name, business address, and business telephone number
legibly written or printed;
(6) An attestation that the physician assistant has:
(i) Passed the physician assistant national certification exam
administered by the National Commission on the Certification of Physician Assistants
within the previous 2 years; or
(ii) Successfully completed 8 category 1 hours of pharmacology
education within the previous 2 years; and
(7) An attestation that the physician assistant has:
(i) A bachelor’s degree or its equivalent; or
(ii) Successfully completed 2 years of work experience as a physician
assistant.
[(d) If a patient care team physician who has delegated authority to exercise
prescriptive authority to a physician assistant subsequently restricts or removes the
delegation, the patient care team physician shall notify the Board of the restriction or
removal within 5 business days.]
– 110 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 675
15–303.
(a) To qualify for a license, an applicant shall:
(5) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, have successfully
completed an educational program for physician assistants accredited by[:
(i) The] THE Accreditation Review Commission on Education for
the Physician Assistant[; or
(ii) If completed before 2001:
1. The Committee on Allied Health Education and
Accreditation; or
2. The Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health
Education Programs] OR ITS PREDECESSOR; and
15–309.
(b) (1) [Each] A licensee shall [give] PROVIDE the Board written notice of any
change of name or address within [60] 10 30 days [of the date of] AFTER the change.
15–314.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 15–315 of this subtitle, a disciplinary
panel, on the affirmative vote of a majority of the quorum, may reprimand any physician
assistant, place any physician assistant on probation, or suspend or revoke a license if the
physician assistant:
(4) Is [professionally, physically, or mentally]:
(I) PROFESSIONALLY INCOMPETENT;
(II) PHYSICALLY INCOMPETENT; OR
(III) MENTALLY incompetent;
(19) [Grossly overutilizes] ESTABLISHES A PATTERN OF GROSS
OVERUTILIZATION OF health care services EXCESSIVE OR MEDICALLY UNNECESSARY
PROCEDURES OR TREATMENT;
(25) [Knowingly] WILLFULLY fails to report suspected child abuse in
violation of § 5–704 of the Family Law Article;
– 111 –

Ch. 675 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(37) [By corrupt means, threats, or force, intimidates] INTIMIDATES or
influences, or attempts to intimidate or influence, for the purpose of causing any person to
withhold or change testimony in hearings or proceedings before the Board or a disciplinary
panel or those otherwise delegated to the Office of Administrative Hearings;
(38) [By corrupt means, threats, or force, hinders] HINDERS WILLFULLY
HINDERS, prevents, or otherwise delays any person from making information available to
the Board or a disciplinary panel in furtherance of any investigation of the Board or a
disciplinary panel;
(46) Fails to comply with the requirements of the Prescription Drug
Monitoring Program under Title 21, Subtitle 2A of the Health – General Article; [or]
(47) Fails to comply with any State or federal law pertaining to the practice
as a physician assistant; OR
(48) WILLFULLY MAKES A MISREPRESENTATION TO A DISCIPLINARY
PANEL.
15–402.1.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a licensed physician may not
employ an individual practicing as a physician assistant who does not have a license or who
has not provided notice to the Board as required under § 15–302(a) of this title.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a hospital, related institution,
alternative health care system, or AN employer may not employ an individual practicing as
a physician assistant who does not have a license.
(c) A disciplinary panel may impose a civil penalty in an amount not exceeding
[$1,000] $5,000 for a violation of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 112 –